I have scoured the message boards and found a few people suffering from the same, but without answers.
PLEASE OFFER INSIGHT! I will be so grateful
look up something called derealization. it seems scary but common
TAYLOR my man, listen to me. I know what you have. You have MOLD somewhere in your house.youve been breathing it for antime and your immune system just let go. Look up aspergiliosis mold. Those are the exact symptomes. I cant beleive everybody is telling you that you are depressed.
Do you live in a humid or water dammaged home ?
You have to do a keto diet. Send me an email if you want. Sunshinefrost at msn
Mold really affects the brain, you lose interest in everything and your working memory shuts down
With persistance symptoms of congnitive difficulties like poor memory and poor concentration, onset of severe and cronic psychological conditions like anxiety and depression, cronic sleeping problems, cronic daytime fatigue, body aches like fibromialgia, and other unexplained cronic health conditions - all starting with a period of flu like symptoms - then it is most likely some variation of lyme or simular tick(vector) born bacterial infection. It's hard to diagnose lyme in stage two and stage three (cronic lyme) because traditional lab tests and diagnostic protocols do not work effectively after the initial period of flu like symptoms.
Hi david did your condition get better after treating with antibiotics for lyme ?? Please let us know . Thank yoy
Did the iv help?? How are you feeling ?
what youre suffering is depersonalization. It is imperative you try meds with the right help from a professional. The problem is chemical. theres hope and sometimes talking to someone isnt enough sometimes we have to do what feels foreign to see results. Cant hurt to try as long as there is supervision
All of you are deficient in iodine. Google it.
Yes, you are correct.
This is such a irresponsible blanket statement. While this might be true for some people there a certainly others that don`t have an iodine deficiency. And for what it`s worth, over supplementing with iodine can do more harm then good, especially if taken for too long at a higher dose.
how are u guys all doing with your brain fog?
Try Kelp supplement which is rich in iodine. Should do the trick.
Did improved any specific symptoms or overall? Im going to need a second chance with meds.
when im relaxed it improves a little
Well that part of my problem. Very dificult to relax when not remembering. I try it all the time, but the idea of not remembering makes me feel unconfortable.
My guess would be that the Zoloft might help but it will not help with your main symptoms.
Some people in here might suffer from the same, it often takes a long time to be diagnosed because there are no headaches, so most doctors and even neurologists overlook the possibility.
aww i hope u feel better
Brainfog, waking up groggy, not being able to concentrate/think properly, fatigue, tingling limbs, nausea, twitching muscles, head pressure, dizziness, hypersensitivity to light/noise, blurred vision etc. Kind of vague complaints, I imagine there are a lot of people misdiagnosed with anxiety, since these complaints can make one feel quite anxious eventually.
I think it's slowly happening less and less but the worry of it is always there. What does your dr say ? How long u had it?
I`m kind of wondering, none of you has have thought that this could be something more serious. Like an early onset dementia or MS?
Hi Rockers I thought about this and just the thought sends shivers up my spine.
Tyler did the meds help ?
Just saw that your post is over a year old so I hope you got some help!
I'll keep you updated and hope you do the same
Hi rex how are you doing these days ? Pls let us know
What is it that you have
Have you recovered from this ?
How are things for you now?
Please tell me you have found the answers!
Depression is a nasty thing/idea. To think of depression people who have never undergone any stage of it are just responding, ""you can make it better"" ""its all in your head"". But the truth is its not just a figment of your imagination, its your life. If you believe in Karma you can be caught under the Karma of others. Some people are more likely to tap into that Karma and it can destroy them. People who are more in tuned with the world, with life, find themselves bogged down by it. The over active mind can't run for decades on that kind of stress/adrenaline as seen with my own mother.
Now I know I've gotten a bit off topic, but I'm just speaking from personal experiences.
And I'd have to say, no to the drugs, no to the doctors who want to put you on more.
Find yourself, get balanced and get grounded. Practice different meditation's, and that's not just sitting in the lotus position and humming,"" Ohm"".
It can be as simple as reading a book, going for a walk or a hike in the woods or mountains(if you live near any). Reducing how much others rely on you, you need time for you. Do research into the chakras, karma(and that doesn't just mean you did something to deserve anything) past life regressions even. Most importantly be open to anything that could help you.
If your a savant(learned person) of any kind, you need time to relax and recharge.
Hoping you find some peace of mind,
Sounds a bit like depersonalization
Hey Taylor, I have read your note on your problems and it has been a year, has there been any change since? Have you gotten better, and if so.. Could you share?
How are things for you??
I've learned some interesting charactoristics about the fog too:
#1 Smoking weed can take it from bad to unfathomably bad.
From doing lot's of reading on Brain fog and this seemingly can be from a bunch of factors, make sure these things are checked
If anybody needs help or has any questions please feel free to message me.
Taylor, I'd be curious to find out if you have found any solutions to your condition.
I have followed some of the stories about towns being evacuated from contamination in the water at their homes. Now follow me for a second, because although it might start sounding overly dramatic, there are many symptoms that people don't realize come from a very basic source of life, water. But, not because it's natural water, but because the water served to our homes is filled with chemicals and in certain cases, have been contaminated with leaks of gases and other dangerous chemicals to our system. These people being evacuated have suffered from major illnesses, so the contamination has been very high.
But, in most cities, water is ""filtered and decontaminated"" with 2 of the chemicals we deem as safe, because we see it in toothpaste and swimming pools, which are fluoride and chlorine. These are the known symptoms correlated to these chemicals: Depression, low energy, fatigue, low concentration, poor memory, foginess reduced sex drive, headaches, tendencies towards excessive weight.
In short, I just want to propose, since most have you seem to have tried everything, continue to work hard on an organic, clean diet, and excercise, but also take into serious consideration your water source and any products that contain fluoride and chlorine. I have a strong feeling that will make a big difference. If you can, find water from a natural spring, and use it for every need including showers, because the skin absorbs a lot of what goes on it. Don't use skin products, our body produces everything we need, and if you have to, find natural ones.
Also, if you can't find a natural spring, get a serious water filter for your entire home. I would really like to hear if you find this helps, although it might take some time.
Looking forward to hearing from you.
Deficiency in B12 causes all of these symptoms, and it can take years before it will show up in a blood test.
Neurologists generally suggest taking B12 supplements for a few weeks to see if they help.
Is it like your a ghost ? Erm il try explain.... like your not really here, looking from the outside in, dream world, feeling like your in a glass box looking at the world ?
Hi Taylor, I have the same question, since you are not responding, you either got better and happy or dead do you have anything to share about recovery? Thanks for any help
Is this the my new reality?
It cant be just anxiety and being deppressed, if you experience neurological symptoms and others then the anxiety and depression will come natural with it and it wouldn't make sense not to feel like sh*t experiencing symptoms with no answers to not cause concern.
Un provoked panic attack and anxiety
Vision is like the world is not clear and out of focus
On and off symptoms of other stuff as well
Look up all lyme disease symptoms.
Dont get fooled by telling your doctor or gp all your symptoms for them to turn around and say its
Or something that is in the common diagnostic handbook for doctors -_-
Anyway best advice is to not give up in hope and keep searching and keep trying to find answers, and remember if you lived with it for as long as i have its not a rare disease thats life threatening but its certainly uncomfortable.
Also find a gp that will actually sit down and listen and try different paths to help. And not just order a trip to a psychologist and hands anti depressons.
I completely agree with you Dylan.
 anxiety and depression don't appear out of the blue air, they are the consequences of something else, they are symptoms as are fatigue and all other complaints.
 Too bad you can't have a Lyme test, at least you would be able to rule it out, now you have to keep guessing.
 Dylan let me know how you are doing ?
 Why does your head feel weird all da t
 Anxiety plus focusing on it makes it worse
 Horrible memory. Forgetting names, requests, etc, easily.
 Racing thoughts, jumbled thoughts, and random repetitive thoughts.
Anyway, sorry for the long message. I doubt it will be thoroughly read, but I figured I'd share my experience somewhere. This seemed like a nice place to do so.
Be well everyone. I wish you all the very best.
How are you doing these dsys
My question to everyone would be do you think there is a trauma in your life that triggered this? keep in mind trauma can be something supressed from your conscious for years. Medication related? Or did this appear one day out or the blue?
Does anyone notice significant hair loss with this and did it ever grow back?
First ...you're not alone and loved I'm sure. Most of us suffer from something similar. Keep your head up and stay as positive as possible ( I know that's almost impossible ) but negative thoughts will 100% make whats ever causing your symptoms worse. You'll have to study your diet+ work with a doctor + possibly trying medication. As per these forums.. Check lymmes diesese, Vitamin B, Thyroid etc. Good Luck!
thanks Pajjah im going to need it. hope you the best as well.
thanks Pajjah im going to need, but i wish you the best and good health in the future
How are you ? Would like to know if you are feeling better.
Good morning all you lovely people.....
Taylor I know that I have had a conversation about this with you previously. ..and you did not suffer from this....but please young man....never, ever give up searching for a diagnosis...you deserve one..you have your whole life ahead of you xxx
You are still in my thoughts and prayers Tyler. ...
Keep strong. ...big warm hugs to you and all the other people suffering here....try to keep strong all....love dee.xxxx
It must be very hard to take care of yourself and 3 children being so exhausted. Sorry to hear that you didn't get any proper help yet, I know from experience that in itself can make you feel desperate. Good to read though you don't accept just meds, but would like to know the cause.
Firstly; you are not insane and you have got real and serious health problems, like many of us. Since you work in the medical profession you probably know that doctors don't like 'vague', diffuse and systemic complaints. Also they draw strict lines when it comes to blood values.
If your cortisol is raised there is definitely something not right. There is quite a big range between normal cortisol and Cushings, and you can feel pretty miserable in between. I'm a health professional myself and am specialized in treating people with burnout (and sleep problems) so am well aware of problems which could arise from chronic elevated cortisol levels. The symptoms you describe match with it: the inability to get deep sleep at night, nausea and vertigo, the extreme fatigue during day time. The root cause could be restless legs syndrome (sleep deprivation causes elevated cortisol levels), it's a bit of a chicken or egg question. If I may ask: which advise did you get on the RLS?
Though I am not an MD I would like to recommend to you to quit the stimulants; it is just symptom management, and if your adrenals are already overactive it can cause adrenal exhaustion in the end, which is a place you definitely don't want to go.
Again, I realy recommend to have a look at your vitamine B12 and D results; the ranges are set way to low. B12 should really be 350 or above to feel well. Often the bottom limit is set to 150 and you get the message everything is fine when it actually isn't. Same goes for vit. D (with 75 as bottom value).
For some reason deficiencies in these often go hand in hand with elevated cortisol.
I hope your new doctor takes the effort to really get to the bottom of your complaints, and he is able to see the bigger picture. At least you don't seem the person to give up on this, hang on in there.
Did you find any answers ?
anxiety/depression caused by lack of Serotonin in the brain. The more you get depressed, anxiety or stressed, serotonin decreses in the brain. Then at times your brain will use the serotonin it has and it's a quick boost, but not enough to keep functioning as normal. Sorta like a Diabetic how your blood sugar raises at a spike and you have to take meds to bring it back down and elevate it. In this case though we need an anti-depressant to bring back out serotonin and elevate the brain imbalance.
I wish you all the best of health and life and hope you all find help and get better and back to yourself.
Bare with me as I need to digress. Everything in the Universe vibrates, especially the human brain. We have five basic levels of brain vibration or brain waves. The lowest are called Delta and are present when we are in a very deep sleep. Up one we find Theta which represents a light sleep. In the middle we have Alpha which is a daydream state. Then Beta which is our normal waking state and at the top is Gamma which is when we are very alert and also very anxious.
He likened these states to a five-speed gearbox in a car. In a normal brain, all five, lubricated, gears are well used. However, sometimes, maybe due to stress, the car gets stuck in one of those five gears. With hyper-active people, (ADHD) it gets stuck in Gamma but when it gets stuck in Alpha, you experience pretty much the symptoms you described.
Sorry this was soooo long but hopefully it helps, Taylor and do keep in touch, there are a lot of people besides me rooting for you on this site.
Taylor, Having re-read your post, I'm wondering if you suffered a concussion at some point in your life? Symptoms sound very similar and a bad concussion leaves scar tissue on the brain. Right now, concussion is a huge part of the NHL and the NFL with so many hockey and football players suffering the effects of concussion 20 and 30 years later.
feeling spaced out is super common with anxiety. the more you focus on it the worse it gets. impossible not to focus on it though i know
So in the year or more since this was posted has anybody found out anything more about this???
For how long did you take the medications (in total)?
Interesting. It makes sense that you did not feel anything for the first month, since antidepressant effects don't kick in until after a month of daily doses.
I don't know why you felt worse after that, though. Perhaps the dose should have been kept at 10 mg instead of 20 mg.
what made it worse possibly could have been me putting to much focus into it
Hey, my name is Sarah Hamad.
It started 2 yrs ago...
This is request to you if u find treatment for this please inform me also...
High blood pressure is known to damage blood vessels in the brain as well.
Has anyone considered that these symptoms could be due to damage to myelin sheaths?
Just been looking that up....it seems worth trying to get a diagnosis about.
There are many manifestations of mental health issues,which affect people physically - theres no reason to assume it's Lyme disease. Let's leave diagnosis to drs shall we? Alarming those of a sensitive nature really isn't helpful
Fair to say however what do you do having such symptoms that result in mental health. From experience drs use the \"mental\" health as a diagnostic tool when they cant figure out whats wrong with the patient?
I think TaylorMason did see doctors, plenty of them, to no avail.
At a certain point you have to do your own research as a patient, some hints of other people can be helpful. A Lyme test isn't that complicated, better have it checked and move on than being unaware of the possibility it could be the cause of your complaints and having your body deteriorate in the meantime.
Pls let me know what helped you ?
I hope someone find something to help. I'll keep you posted
To everyone currently facing this \"fog\":\nWhat do EEG tests reveal?
So any of you who suffer similar problems as Taylor has experienced a gradual worseneing of their condition.
Omg!!!!!!! I thought I was the only one in the entire world
If anyone can help, Please get in touch.
Keep your head up my friend, you're not alone.
before I knew that other people used it too.
Hello !
Tell me how you feel now? Did the zoloft help you?
I also suspect Something autoimmune is about to gather itself, Because the credits are Ner-2.
hi all
wish you all the best of luck
lamictal and nanotrecal are both used for dp/dr with success
I was curious and just felt like I should bring it up.
Yes, eating more vegetables can help.
That being said \"ascension\" is purely holistic, and you should be aware that it has no actual medical backup outside of holistic medicine and putting these symptoms as a \"spiritual issue\" could be dangerous. Yes, many physical things can start with the brain, but please don't brush these off as a holistic issue without proper testing by a medical professional. Many \"clean eaters\" suffer from malnutrition. Eating clean doesn't mean you're getting all your nutrients! Know your macros, get ENOUGH clean protein, even if its not through meat. Unless you KNOW what you are doing with things like keto please eat your carbs, and if you are doing keto and the \"keto flu\" persists, then look into seeing a licensed nutritionist to get help with it or advice as to whether you should stay on it.
A side note about veg, for people with sensitive stomachs you could also look into avoiding nightshade vegetables and the like. While they do not cause issues in most people, they can cause inflammation (as well as brain fog, fatigue, etc.) in people who already have chronic intestinal disorders. I recommend trying to limit them for a bit just to see if it helps.
do you have any memory issues ??are you taking medication for lyme ?
Hi. did anyone find out what the problem was ? anything that helps ? it keeps getting worse,out of control.
I can say that this intense fog really stinks so my heart goes out to everyone here and my prayer for each and everyone of you is that you would heal and be done with this.
"This reply has been deleted by a moderator
let me know when you get my last reply because they have to moderate it
The way we think extremely affects our overall health. We have nerves all over our body that is connected to our brain. But not only that, we have our endocrine system that consists of ductless glands which secrete hormones directly to our circulatory system. It functions almost similar to our brain. One of the hormones it produce is cortisol and it should be in NORMAL LEVEL. If level is too high results to agitation while low level results to fatigue.
Doing exercise and eating healthy is a GREAT step for depression.
I've read some studies about the benefits of sun bathing for this.
This reply has been deleted by a moderator
how do you test for this? I've wondered if this our problem too.
Did you have any anxiety before moving in the house or did it begin once moving there?
After years of searching though, I found the right help. I am not an \"expert\", but I can tell you what I have learned and how I found healing: Brain fog can, and is often caused by, an anxiety disorder. Chronic stress can change the way the brain functions. When we behave anxiously, an area of our brain called the amygdala sends a stress response to the hypothalamus, which then secretes stress hormones such as adrenaline and cortisol to specific areas of our body. These hormones produce an array of physiological, psychological, and emotional symptoms. This is commonly known as the \"fight or flight\" symptom. Stress hormones can impact the brain. For example, stress can do the following:
Hi! Did you actually see the mold or did you get testing done to detect it? Also, was it black mold?
I agree that it is not user friendly, but I have found some great information on here! I swear I feel a bit better just know there are so many others with similar symptoms!
Did you find anything that helps ?
Yes it is a rather old post but doesn't mean people can't relate to it anymore. And it just proves that this is a major issue that should be addressed more.
And yet here you are.
Hi this post is 4 years old. Just to let you know. x
This post is 4 years old folks. If you have an issue why not put it up as a new post? x
Thank you. This is helpful and inspiring to me ❤️
I wish you peace and love and no expectations.Dale
I honestly think there are a lot of people out there who feel the same way as well.
A lot of the posts I read on here seem to have good reason; PTS, loss, finances etc - does anyone have no 'good' reason?
anyway sorry for rambling its just good to know im not alone that there are other ppl like this
i just want to start by saying thank you .
"Words are just that. Im not trying to be rude to the ones giving great advice . But when your in a state of hoplessness words are just words. It helps to talk and have a person listen truly listen
As for 'got better', I'm not sure you do. My view of it is a bit like alcoholics - you're always an alcoholic you're just x years sober. A person who has depression might be x years 'positive'!
"Around, but letting this thread take its own course now. I've left others to decide on good advice for posters who use this thread as a beacon for their own issues. If you read through all of it you'll see I've replied over the years if I've been explicitly referenced or asked.
"I am not sure rsjg is still around, no response to any queries, maybe got better.
but ask your self questions about you, about your dreams and your passions(if you don’t have any think about past passions or anything that may make you smile, switch things up).people who love you will respect what you want and allow you to do what you need to do to get better.
for me as an example a life with a purpose is a life that makes the world a better place.you could want to make a mark like writing a book.
or ask yourself what has made you happy in the past? And what would give someones life purpose?
so as a random example f**k off to africa or the slums in India and help the dying children.
i want a purpose and I want to do something that will give my life vaule.
my advice would be to find something you care about. so for me I would be like what do I want from life?
"So to me it sounds like ur depressed because I think lots of people diagnosed with depression feel empty and purposeless.
"Just want to say folks that this post is 4 years old. If anyone has issues it is a much better idea to put your own post up to ensure everyone can see it. It can get lost on someone elses post. x
Fact people is we are rot. We are forgotren weeds that are just waiting to not have to wake up or for a opportunity to be useful.
"Wow so true to my existence
"So glad. It's evident that most of us value you.
"Wow, so gratified you are still around. Good idea letting discussions happen and learn, i try to do same. Good luck to you.
"Still here. But just standing back, letting others lead, discuss and share.
"Anyone notice rsjg has not replied for four years, wondering if hes still here
I love you dearly.... even if I don't know you. And I hope you one day see the beauty in the world and in yourself.
Your a beautiful specimen, no.... you're more than a measly specimen....you're a beautiful painite, precious, amazing, unique and rare gem. And you matter more than anything.
"Hi. I'm not gonna be saying a lot (hopefully) but.... just try. I know what you mean. And the best thing to do would be to try. Try to find the wonderful and beautiful things in everyday life. Know that YOU ARE NOT USELESS AND YOU MATTER TO E.V.E.R.Y.O.N.E. Whenever you think that you're not worth it, CHANGE THAT BAD THOUGHT AROUND TO ""I AM WORTH IT!"" Look yourself in the mirror and say ""I. AM. WORTH. IT"" and keep repeating it with emphasis. Doing this will eventually change your mindset...or at least I hope it would.
Nobody was born with their consent, we should therefore be granted the inherent right to decide how and when we die.
"Perhaps we should all stand together and continue Dr. Kevorkian's fight. Not just for those who are termanilly ill, but also for those of us who are ""tired"".
"My word Chris, you are eloquent - so well written. It seems you have had a long path of self discovery and have come to a place of simple acceptance. Your words are soothing.
PS hope you like me
And rsjg, carry on being yourself and don't go beating yourself up too much. You say you have helped others and I am sure others accept you for who you are even if you think they shouldn't. It's up to them!
Thanks to hypercat for mentioning CEN, I am sure it is something that has contributed to my problem but I am not keen on labels. It is too easy to say I am this or I am that, you must make me better. What is the point of a label with out effective treatment and a solution. At the end of the day 'it is what it is' and 'we are who we are'. I think we all react differently to life's difficulties some fight some run some just struggle. I endure, that is the truth and I hate saying it but accept it. From there I can move on. Probably to nowhere but hey-ho!
I appreciate you caring enough to respond. Means a lot.
If you are having such thoughts then please do reach out to the team at the Samaritans (or the other people detailed in our leaflet) who will understand what you're going through and will be able to help.
Their contact details are on our patient information leaflet here: https://patient.info/health/dealing-with-suicidal-thoughts, which also offers lots of other advice on how you can access the help you may need.
If you are having these suicidal thoughts then we strongly recommend you speak to someone who may be able to help. The Samaritans offer a safe space where you can talk openly about what you are going through. They can help you explore your options, understand your problems better, or just be there to listen.
We note from a recent post which you have made to our forum that you may be experiencing thoughts around self-harm. If we have misinterpreted your comments then we apologies for contacting you directly. But if you are having such thoughts then please note that you are not alone in this, and there are people out there that can help.
my few friends says I am mentall
"Hi hope you doing fine in life! its been 4years you written this article.
"Hi I didn't put the link on at first coz it has to be checked by the moderator. I just remembered I can put links on now without it being delayed! x
"https://www.goodtherapy.org/blog/how-to-recognize-overcome-childhood-emotional-neglect-0218165
"Wanting to kill yourself doesn't in itself mean you are depressed or mentally unstable. Some people (and it seems like this is you) are just extremely unhappy, without an obvious cause. I have no answers for you, other than to say always try to find something....anything....to make it worthwhile being around tomorrow.
But genuinely, thank you, it means a lot
But I do hope that you are still with us and that you're enduring life the best that you can. If so, realize that you have added a lot of value to our lives--and please feel proud of that.
I realize it's been several years since you've contributed to this discussion. I'm going to assume it's because it has become an energy drain on you, which would be very understandable.
You also mention eventually becoming a burden to your girlfriend. Okay, that might be true. But have you considered why your girlfriend is spending her life with you? It's quite possible that she sees the same qualities in you that I (and possibly others on this board) see. Meaning, you add value to her life too. If not, she would be just another friend who has distanced themselves from you.
Not to mention giving. Your post indicates that you are indirectly asking for help. What you've ended up with is a bunch of people who want to commiserate with you, often making your post about themselves. And what did you do? You ended up counseling them!
* interesting! (boring people blather on about superficial topics, you are everything BUT superficial)
* emotionally honest (what you call ""negative""
What that says to me is that you are:
In my opinion, you are just responding to the accumulative effects of life (it's okay to blame life). Nearly all of us feel this way at times. Why else do you think that so many people have responded to your post? What we all have in common is the ""human condition"". But it's the way that you've described this state of depression...no one else has articulated it so well.
you alone are the most high over all the earth.""
Psalm 83: 18 ""May all men know that you, whose name is Jehovah,
Phillipians 4: 6, 7 ""Do not be anxious over anything, but in everything by prayer and supplication along with thanksgiving, let your petitions be made known to God and the peace of God that excels all thought will guard your hearts and MENTAL powers by means of Christ Jesus.
I was moved by your saying you don't blame your mom, even though what she said made you angry. No mom or dad would knowingly put their children in harms way. We really hope and believe we are doing what's best. Unfortunately most of what we know is taught to us by another imperfect human so results may vary.... Let God be found true though every man a liar. The wisdom of this world is foolishness with God.
I agree. What if this is just 'me'.
Don’t sign a bad book deal. Make some money!!
"Take all this and write a book. You’re very articulate, well educated and so many people feel the same. Find a catchy title and start typing. You’ll do great!
Also know the world does have many people who genuinely care.
If you tried this let me know if you did?
When you wake up run a bath not to hot sit back back enjoy the heat for a couple of minutes then very slowly run the cold water let it stay on until it's pretty cold but not freezing but enough where your not totally comfortable.
I can't help you find this but i can suggest things that will kickstart and they start off very basic.
Feelings and emotions are only real because we allow them to be have you ever killed a bug and felt nothing ? You allowed yourself to feel nothing (It's not oh it's only a bug) You feel nothing because you allowed it be it because of ""It's Accepted"" by society or whatever. The feelings you have now are there because you've accepted them and/or were taken medicine. If you choose to be happy you will and I don't mean putting on a smile and ""Acting"" positive.
Life feels pointless because of death or of others death but it's not pointless everyday the person you see your gf or whoever is blessed to have you she sees in you what you see in her but regardless you need to find what you loved about life before you felt this way and s'ying i don't know is a copout really.
People who do stuff or live a certain way because they see someone else enjoying and you don't that's not the life for you deep down you'll probably know this.
The hard part is quite easy all you have to do is what i said find what made you happy before then emulate it and if not possible then ask yourself why not?
There really is no-one holding anyone back except ourselves even with responsibility like family or even if family is the problem work social life anything doesn't matter. The fact that there people who express the same emotions as you or me can only mean 2 things to me.
I know it's easy to tell people what will help them but you should find what you loved in life before you felt this way and if you find that answer and the answer is something that is no longer possible you now have the answer why you feel this way.
(The above passage was tracked down by Matt Seybold of the Center for Mark Twain Studies)
""Ask yourself a most profound question: “What are the two most important days in my life?” THE DAY YOU WERE BORN and THE DAY YOU REALIZE WHY YOU WERE BORN! And why were you born? You were born to bless the lives of others. You were born to make a contribution.""
A quote apparently not by Mark Twain, but traced to a passage from a book by Anita Canfield entitled, 'A Woman & Her Self-Esteem'
It might not be a fluke that we've all found each other here.
But anyway, thanks for your words. I shall try to remember them in the hope that one day, if even for a brief moment, I can believe them.
"I do read, I rarely reply these days. Not much I can attempt to disagree with in your words but, seeing as you took the time, it would be rude not to acknowledge my appreciation for your efforts.
Being 'fun' and 'easy-going' are underrated anyway I hope life is improving for you and you don't feel you need to put up so many appearances.
Please don't take how you feel about yourself for an objective reality, and please don't imagine that you're of any less value than the rest of us. Don't imagine that you have to be a certain way for people to care about you and certainly don't put up any pretence about who you are.
In the long term, I am as certain as I can be of anything that it would hurt your family. Not guilt-trip, but it seems that these thighs stem from a lack of self-worth.
You also mentioned how you try to be easy going and fun around friends but this is exhausting. You don't need to be easy going and fun. Whoever said that these are the virtues we need to embody? There are many out there who appreciate far more the qualities of self-knowledge, humility and even self-doubt. It's what we all feel, to greater or lesser degrees, though most try to hide it.
I'm sorry the medication didn't work. don't let this experience write off medication entirely. It may be that you haven't found the right medicine yet. Not that that is the solution, but it can provide a helping step on the way.
As most of us do, you seem to place a lot of emphasis on your relationships with others, and how much of a burden you may be to them. Above all though, it seems like you perceive yourself as a burden from the outset. If you believe this then, at least in your own eyes, this is what you will become.
I'm sorry you have so much perceived failure in your life. Reading your post, it sounds like you try so hard, so hard that you are affecting an image that isn't your own. This in itself is exhausting and of course it leads to a sense of failure. How can you be this appearance you aspire to be?
"I don't know if you still receive these comments but thought I would reply regardless.
May I suggest something that may seemed far fetched, sell everything you own go to a place of your ideal climate work just enough to survive (possibly a bar), play the lottery at least once a month and just enjoy your surroundings as much as you can.
"Hello,your problem is so painful.But mine that of course you can come back if you realize what is base your problem.It has the advantage of finding the solution and many of you will find solutions for yourself.
I wish you all the luck in the world.
But please don't take this as a direct response to your own issues. We're all different. Start your own thread and see if you can find any answers or actions that can help you.
http://patient.uservoice.com/knowledgebase/articles/398331-private-messages
http://patient.uservoice.com/knowledgebase/articles/398316-adding-links-to-posts
Moderator comment: I have removed the link(s) directing to site(s) unsuitable for inclusion in the forums. If users want this information please use the Private Message service to request the details.
But if you're feeling that low now and have never sought help before, the doctors should be accessed immediately. Explore all options before you give up. Good luck.
You may find that it's an easy fix for you if someone professional looks at it - I'm not sure how long you've felt the way you do or anything but something's can be simply chemical deficiencies that are easily rectified. If you go to a doctor and still don't have any solutions then maybe this kind of forum may help.
"My 'status' is of no help or relevance to you. But you sound like you need help so maybe your first point of call should be a doctor.
"*Should have been wasn't not was.
If interested have a look at it. I got most of my info from Psych Central. It might ring some bells for you too. x
I think the good news for you is that you are still here so you are getting through life somehow 3 years later. I still think counselling would help you but it wouldn't be easy and it would be long term.
"I agree with you about your post rsjg. I have never known a post to be this long before!
"Same here what do I do then
"That was supposed to be bueler, not butler.
Why should death be scary? We are born and its beautiful! We become children and it beautiful! We get married and it beautiful! We have children and it Beautiful !We have grandchildren and it Beautiful! Why cant our death be beautiful!?
I really believe that this is our ""Cocoon"" and once we break out and release the true ""Us"", we will reach our real potential or move on to the next stage of evolution.
It was luck that helped us develop large brains and dominate the planet, there are endless other possibilities of how things could have gone for Mankind!
Confused mind with always options and finally end with not choosing either.
Hope you're doing better, keep well and keep on keepin' on - you never know what kinda goodness could be lurking around the next corner or wrapped in a mundane-appearing tomorrow.
"...(sorry my finger bumped 'reply' at the wrong time) to continue...I keep close by from the book of Jeremiah in the Bible, chapter 29 and verse 11, ""For I know the plans I have for you,” declares the Lord, “plans to prosper you and not to harm you, plans to give you hope and a future.""
Well, that went grey pretty quick jeez, lol. Anyway perhaps just this very act of sharing is enough to keep hope alive...like a support group of sorts...I'll leave you with a verse that
I guess that is life.
Mmm, maybe I should stop writing today. Good luck with your own journeys. Take solace in the belief that I am hopefully not typical. If you can find your cause you have hope of fixing it. If you have not messed stuff up because of it then hopefully things can get better from here. I have seen, and spoken to a few people, who have been at very very low points and gone on to have very successful and, more importantly, happy lives.
"It's been a few years since post. I was searching around and came across this post and was wondering how things are going
Easy on yourself and just let it be
Each person ...is different and unique ...and almost always has a ""straw that broke the camel's back""
Now I know I am about to open a can of worms here but .....feeling down or feeling ""blue"" isin't depression.
Wishing you the best.
"I would advise you to do some breathing exercises. They Help. Drink a lot of water. Begin your day with a slow pace. Study the benefits of cold showers for your condition. Try to join team sports like football or what ever.
1. Doing something constructive with a tangible and productive outcome.
4. Doing something new and challenging that I beleive will lead to tangible positive effects for myself and or others.
3. Doing something that has lasting positive benifeits and effects on my own living conditions or those of someone I care about.
2. Doing something that immidiately benifeits myself or someone I care about.
A lot of the posts I read on here seem to have good reason; PTS, loss, finances etc - does anyone have no 'good' reason?
i wish you all the strength
Thank you. I wish you luck too. I'm sure you've made some right decisions. Wouldn't it be nice to read about someone who 'recovered' or will we have to live this til the end?
yes...it woukd be very nice to read about someone who has been suffering from depr. and is now feeling happy and normal again
What a fantastic answer, but also a really bad one!! Let me explain...
Firstly I'm very pleased to see you are happy and treat every day as a gift. Obviously I'm sorry you have such daily physical problems but I'm sure that makes you even happier you did the skydiving when you did. I'm really pleased what you did worked for you and it's encouraging to find a rare example of someone who has somewhat defeated depression even if the cost of that has been quite extreme.
And this is why your answer is both fantastic and bad! For you, and others it may work. You are obviously an inspiration to lots of people not only for the physical issues (which are almost a separate issue) but for the fact you have altered your way of thinking in a positive manner. But they also highlight how everyone's issues are unique - and as well intentioned, and even correct, your view that it could be worse it, that can actually make people feel worse.
Thanks for your reply, I hope I didn't come across aggressively! I'm very happy that you are happy and hope things improve if that's possible for you. Good luck, have a great Christmas and a lovely New Year.
Well, from reading your stuff here it would appear that we think in a similar fashion. Quite obvious really, otherwise why was I searching for other's thoughts on 'being tired of life'!
Anyway, having read all of your posts here I'd like to say that I appreciate someone taking the time to punctuate as properly as someone can be reasonably expected to.
I read someone here say to get some 'less stressful' work like in a warehouse or something similar, well, let me tell that person that any and all work which involves interaction with other humans is highly stressful, incredibly tiring and seemingly ultimately pointless!
It is New Year's Day 2016 and thankfully that (oh such fun and loving) period of falseness is over for another 11 months! I wonder how many more there will be and will they all be quite so alone (not lonely) for me.
you apparently have some free time on your hands during the days while the bread winner in your team is at work for you. You also sound as though you like to help people and don't currently have any excuse not to try something simple for someone else's benifit. So, what I want you to do with your loose end time is to research (get this right please) High Functioning Asperger's Syndrome for me. Now, I cannot pay you, you will purely be helping me out, there is no end to the research and all you get is satisfaction and something else to think about for a while.
How does this sound to you?
At least Google - High Functioning Asperger's Syndrome, become a specialist and help people in the future to work smarter with my lifelong challenges.
Cheers and Happy New Year
I had a few people on her write to me over Xmas/ New Year but needed to ignore them - too much energy was needed to focus on acting happy and normal around family!
I wish I could talk to you more directly than on an open forum. I've said before, knowledge is a great thing - but it can also be a curse. You need to be particuarly careful self-diagnosing but also need to think whether this diagnosis is in any way helpful to you. Say you decide that you are HFAS - how does that help you? If you can't source help then it is just another meaningless semantic for feeling awful day to day.
I'd never pick holes in others punctuation and grammar unless they were doing it to others! It's a forum, not a thesis! However if you have the time and pride to check your message back then maybe you do have the time to look at HFAS if it interests you.
To be honest, knowledge is something I despise yet am addicted to so I will inevitably be searching HFSA after I've written this reply! But without an argument or focus it is impossible to really research a topic to any purpose. I will happily help others if I can (preferably from afar!) but not sure what I could do to focus your research on this matter and whether it'd even be of any benefit to you anyway.
Like I said, there is certainly an interesting discussion to be had but unfortunately I doubt this is the place to do it effectively for you or I.
As I'm sure you're aware, everyone is somewhere on the autistic spectrum and all the various labels that spin off that. Even the most 'normal' of people might feel particuarly calmed by a colour, or get irritated by a simple tapping noise. The issues arise when your 'quirks' impact on your life. Mine do for me, and yours sound like they do for you.
I have had a ton of labels I have both researched or been told about that might fit my ways of thinking and acting but the conclusion I reached was that it was all kind of pointless - a label by its very nature is just a broad title to fit many people and when that comes to the brain it's a very pointless exercise. You might be able to group broken limbs in patients but with the head it's nearly impossible - there's too many bits that do or don't apply for every individual. Ultimately a title is only helpful to point you in the right direction to get you personalised help. And it HAS to be personalised.
Think about what you want from this title. How will it help you? You might be better focusing on the things that make you feel better, not labelling something that makes you feel bad.
Well let's try simplify things yer take a short cut home and trip and break your ankle.
Painful and going to take time to heal. You do what's required without a second thought. You think about it you convince yourself that rest and guidance is the key but you never need to question why that day you chose the short cut.
The brain however gets a rougher deal if that breaks. You know what you need to do because the experts tell you but why believe them ? Why ? Let's question and even if there right you question how. When. Why me.
Forgive forget way up see what yer got live now move on.
Been there its around the corner. Just let it be
Mate I can't speak for others but compared to some on this path you are to be applauded. You are nothing short of a perfect human being that I for one would happily share this planet.
There is a simple answer for you to feel what others feel but I personally think you should stay where you are and that is to live for the next breath.
Join the army. Your overthinking and social anxiety is caused by the fact that there is too much in this world. Too many potential opportunities choices and expectations. In the at you have a very simple job and it sets up a routine and discipline.
I dip between a wish to not be around that is forever there and seems to be backed up with wholly logical reasons that people genuinely struggle to refute to absolutely crashing panic attacks/ given up when my 'theories' are proved.
A lot of the posts I read on here seem to have good reason; PTS, loss, finances etc - does anyone have no 'good' reason?
What is depression and what is just character?!
I get the impression that you are highly sensitive, empathic, and have high ideals.
Let's be honest, there is more bad in this world than there is good. Consciously or not, we're all constantly being barraged with negative messages. And negative emotions have more staying power than fleeting feelings of joy. Your brain is more than likely over stimulated and is compensating / protecting you by dulling your emotions.
Think of a traumatic event that you have witnessed (car crash, violent scene in a movie, etc.). Your senses are on high alert, you question yourself as to whether you really saw and heard what just happened, you find yourself in shock.
Like shock, depression is a manifestation of our brain's self-protecting powers. It's by no means a comfortable state of being, it leaves one feeling 'flat' (to depress is to flatten), apathetic, tired. But it's an effective mechanism that shields us from feeling intense upset.
What you are describing rsjg, is typical depression. I think that you will find that you will cycle in and out of it throughout your lifetime. This is not a character weakness, as you come off as being very honest, insightful, caring, and intelligent.
I haven't lived in Brittain (I'm assuming that's where you're from) but here in the U.S. there is tremendous (and unrealistic) pressure to be happy all the time. Nobody can live up to that standard, and 'phonying up' (so others will be more comfortable around you) and living with self - deception is exhausting. If that doesn't rob one of a strong sense of self, depression surely will. The best that we should aim for is contentment.
Thank you for your wise words.
Sorry to hear that! If only there were a magic pill.
Like the therapist who advised the main female character in The Stepford Wives, I say ""Get the hell out of there!""
"I doubt you have no one, family is only one part. Work friends? Neighbours?
But, for the sake of discussion, if there is really no-one then in a way you know how to feel better and that gives you a lot of power. I don't even know how to be 'happy' and feel I should leave those around me before I drag them down too!
If you feel lonely, then be a little more proactive, join some clubs or groups etc. Without being offensive, you are a little older than me and there are a lot more clubs set up for your age group than mine that wouldn't be intimidating. I get expectations of sports clubs (loud bravado people!) or nightclubs etc where as I'm sure there are more suitable groups for you. Knowing what you want to make you happy is a great thing.
As for your family, you seem to want nothing to do with them. Great! Sorry, people on here may say that's sad etc or to try but it's your situation - if you simply don't get on then absolutely forget them. People survive without families all the time. Or you mentioned the recluse, maybe you need each other...
I sympathise, in case that didn't come across, so whilst I appreciate I have one on you by having a partner (although that can make you feel worse by the way in that you feel like a burden) you also have one on me knowing what will make you happy.
You don't need family/partner to feel loved. In fact family's love often feels more 'because you're family' than out of want. Friends are there purely because they want to be.
I apologise if I jumped to conclusions based on your message but I maintain that with the active social life you live you have LOADS of people who would miss you. Love is not exclusively available from family and partners. You seemed to suggest this was why you were largely unhappy so I think you know what makes you tick; you miss a partner/ family bonds. I'm not going to be stupid enough to say 'fix it' then as it's never that simple, but knowing what would make you happy is a positive; at least it gives you a target.
There is not much more available to me because of my age then there is you. Many of the groups are for old people who want to knit and gossip. Nearly all of them have or did have partners, children and grandchildren and I don't so I don't have a lot in common with them.
I feel you have missed the point of the writer, and you are wrong about the clubs and activities - you have plenty no matter what age, but when you are depressed and have lost your confidence, it is incredibly hard to get up and do those things. Be gentle on us older folk - I am 58. It is a harsh climate out there if you are that age - your husbands seek young women, it's hard to find work, and your body and hormones are not playing well with your ego.
A lot of the posts I read on here seem to have good reason; PTS, loss, finances etc - does anyone have no 'good' reason?
i wish you all the strength
Thank you. I wish you luck too. I'm sure you've made some right decisions. Wouldn't it be nice to read about someone who 'recovered' or will we have to live this til the end?
yes...it woukd be very nice to read about someone who has been suffering from depr. and is now feeling happy and normal again
What a fantastic answer, but also a really bad one!! Let me explain...
Firstly I'm very pleased to see you are happy and treat every day as a gift. Obviously I'm sorry you have such daily physical problems but I'm sure that makes you even happier you did the skydiving when you did. I'm really pleased what you did worked for you and it's encouraging to find a rare example of someone who has somewhat defeated depression even if the cost of that has been quite extreme.
And this is why your answer is both fantastic and bad! For you, and others it may work. You are obviously an inspiration to lots of people not only for the physical issues (which are almost a separate issue) but for the fact you have altered your way of thinking in a positive manner. But they also highlight how everyone's issues are unique - and as well intentioned, and even correct, your view that it could be worse it, that can actually make people feel worse.
Thanks for your reply, I hope I didn't come across aggressively! I'm very happy that you are happy and hope things improve if that's possible for you. Good luck, have a great Christmas and a lovely New Year.
Well, from reading your stuff here it would appear that we think in a similar fashion. Quite obvious really, otherwise why was I searching for other's thoughts on 'being tired of life'!
Anyway, having read all of your posts here I'd like to say that I appreciate someone taking the time to punctuate as properly as someone can be reasonably expected to.
I read someone here say to get some 'less stressful' work like in a warehouse or something similar, well, let me tell that person that any and all work which involves interaction with other humans is highly stressful, incredibly tiring and seemingly ultimately pointless!
you apparently have some free time on your hands during the days while the bread winner in your team is at work for you. You also sound as though you like to help people and don't currently have any excuse not to try something simple for someone else's benifit. So, what I want you to do with your loose end time is to research (get this right please) High Functioning Asperger's Syndrome for me. Now, I cannot pay you, you will purely be helping me out, there is no end to the research and all you get is satisfaction and something else to think about for a while.
At least Google - High Functioning Asperger's Syndrome, become a specialist and help people in the future to work smarter with my lifelong challenges.
I had a few people on her write to me over Xmas/ New Year but needed to ignore them - too much energy was needed to focus on acting happy and normal around family!
I wish I could talk to you more directly than on an open forum. I've said before, knowledge is a great thing - but it can also be a curse. You need to be particuarly careful self-diagnosing but also need to think whether this diagnosis is in any way helpful to you. Say you decide that you are HFAS - how does that help you? If you can't source help then it is just another meaningless semantic for feeling awful day to day.
I'd never pick holes in others punctuation and grammar unless they were doing it to others! It's a forum, not a thesis! However if you have the time and pride to check your message back then maybe you do have the time to look at HFAS if it interests you.
To be honest, knowledge is something I despise yet am addicted to so I will inevitably be searching HFSA after I've written this reply! But without an argument or focus it is impossible to really research a topic to any purpose. I will happily help others if I can (preferably from afar!) but not sure what I could do to focus your research on this matter and whether it'd even be of any benefit to you anyway.
Like I said, there is certainly an interesting discussion to be had but unfortunately I doubt this is the place to do it effectively for you or I.
Quick research, scan read. Told you I would... I definitely don't have HFSA. You may well have but it'd take more than a quick chat to establish that.
As I'm sure you're aware, everyone is somewhere on the autistic spectrum and all the various labels that spin off that. Even the most 'normal' of people might feel particuarly calmed by a colour, or get irritated by a simple tapping noise. The issues arise when your 'quirks' impact on your life. Mine do for me, and yours sound like they do for you.
I have had a ton of labels I have both researched or been told about that might fit my ways of thinking and acting but the conclusion I reached was that it was all kind of pointless - a label by its very nature is just a broad title to fit many people and when that comes to the brain it's a very pointless exercise. You might be able to group broken limbs in patients but with the head it's nearly impossible - there's too many bits that do or don't apply for every individual. Ultimately a title is only helpful to point you in the right direction to get you personalised help. And it HAS to be personalised.
​Think about what you want from this title. How will it help you? You might be better focusing on the things that make you feel better, not labelling something that makes you feel bad.
Well let's try simplify things yer take a short cut home and trip and break your ankle.
Painful and going to take time to heal. You do what's required without a second thought. You think about it you convince yourself that rest and guidance is the key but you never need to question why that day you chose the short cut.
The brain however gets a rougher deal if that breaks. You know what you need to do because the experts tell you but why believe them ? Why ? Let's question and even if there right you question how. When. Why me.
Forgive forget way up see what yer got live now move on.
Mate I can't speak for others but compared to some on this path you are to be applauded. You are nothing short of a perfect human being that I for one would happily share this planet.
There is a simple answer for you to feel what others feel but I personally think you should stay where you are and that is to live for the next breath.
I'm not sure what the protocol on here is for a 'knowing nod' so I'll just give you virtual hug and hope we both have a miracle!
Maybe on here! But what's hardest is seeing other people cope/ find it easy to do things you can't, e.g. make a phone call! It should be a simple task but I find it incredibly difficult. Everyone stresses, we all know that - its the degree to which we do and how it effects us before and after the event.
You don't need to have a life changing event or crisis to suffer depression. All you need is to not be producing enough serotonin in your brain. And you get this feeling you described of never truly enjoying life.
I just wanted to say give everything a try to keep yourself motiviated even if its going to the gym, catching up with a friend or trying a new job.
I just want to say your not alone and more people are suffering from anxiety/depression these days and you dont realise how common it is as people find it hard to dicuss as its your emotions and feelings. My doctor said it can depend on your personality and just what kind of person you and how you react to a situation.
Great message. Funnily enough I am/was a teacher too - but I think the environment is particularly toxic for those with is style of thinking (the profession is based around you/ the work never being good enough and what can you do to improve in the UK)
As regards you, I'd stay in Australia! I imagine it's a lot nicer when you have a crappy day opening the curtains to sunshine! Tthat'd make a little, but significant difference.
Maybe try and get a job with less stress like working in retail or a warehouse i know its not a career but sometimes we need to just do something different . Im sure you will be fine and try not to think the worse you need things to look forward to and not worry what will happen as thats no way to live your life.
I wish you luck with your future too - I hope you are doing something to try and fight it as I think without at least trying Meds/ Talk therapy etc then giving up in your head can easily turn in to giving up 'properly'.
Thats emotional flatness and it is depression. You sound like you've got a lot going for you, plenty of work experience, a girlfriend. I get that you can't enjoy anything, maybe talk to your doctor about getting another prescription? Sometimes certain medications work better than others. Regular exercise is good eg running. Happiness is a concept which is chosen. Try to see the brilliant person that you are and how much you've already done. See you feeling discontent with your occupation as a chance to do something about it. Think about what sort of job you'd really want to do. The problem is we grow up around the news which is often a negative source of information. Mindfulness may be of help to you, meditation could help too.
People say knowledge is power, but I find it to be a curse. The more you know, the more you realise your insignificance, the hopelessness of situations and the reality of the world rather than the rose-tinted 'it'll all work out in the end' view we're told to believe. I really struggle with the inability of professionals to accept that some people don't succeed, some people do fail, some people aren't talented, some people aren't nice - why can't that be me? It's no different than saying ""it can't happen to me"".
 I'm new here, so its strange to see that 8 months have passed since you started this thread. I want to ask how things have been during the last 8 months. I also have lots of questions about how things have moved in your life (internally and externally), even relating to any treatment or recovery processes.
 Have you come any closer to deciding which aspects of your experience might be depression and which may be character?
 Have you found ways to feel less like a burden?
 What decisions did you make regarding work and relationships and where have you found suppot during the 8 months?
 When you wrote initially, you said you weren't looking for answers, but now you admit that you had hoped for advice and signposting, and felt disappointed at the input from this website. Well, I was quite glad to read through your post and the responses as I felt there was a lot there to provide some direction and inspiraton. I think your hope for advice and signposting is quite realistic, looking through the various responses.
 You talked before about cycles of mood? Is that something which is still going for you? How does that work in your life?
 Just drinking a juice of cucumber and tomato - deelicious and fresh.​
 So, sorry and hope you have more success.
 I'm not deluded enough to think people wouldn't care if someone close to them wasn't there anymore. People aren't generally that heartless. However, it doesn't mean they wouldn't be better off. Like a child who is removed from an unfit parent; they'd cry and be upset and miss them but ultimately they're better off. We all get over loss - we don't as easily get over regret, disappointment and missed opportunities. Only I hold people back.
 Love Life - good and yet that makes it bad! If I didn't care about her I'd be quite happy taking advantage but if you love someone you don't want to hurt them in any way, emotionally, financially, future etc. If you love them let them go as the saying goes...
 Health - other than this(!) ok really, standard weight, normal height, don't smoke, drink or do drugs. Eat reasonably healthily and do sport sporadically when it's either sunny and/or I have a spark of inspiration. Tried routines, lasted a week before a bad day threw it all off.
 All I know is we are part of the future and the history of this world. Only God knows our purpose in this world.
 Live life and do what we can, there are many things that we can't do and we can't change, there are still little things that we can do.
 We are just a drop of water in the ocean but we still make up a part of the ocean.
 Hope things get better for you and me.
 I hope things improve for you,hopefully your faith gives you a base to work from and you turn around those feelings you have. If you believe what you have written then I feel you are closer than you think you are to accepting/being happy.
 Comments greatfully received.
Sounds like you've got a raging H. pylori infection, you need antibiotics for this. (If it's really really raging / painful) a Gastroscopy (an endoscope down the Throat and into the Stomach) to get an idea of it's true extent would be very helpful. If you are of modest means then some Generic Soluble Paracetamol could hit the spot, if you are a bit more minted then I'd go for Soluble Solpadeine Max,, do not take Ibuprofen, Aspirin or Diclofenac (or any other NSAID), nor use any creams or gels containing these drugs...
In that case then the Endoscopy is definitely the way to go. If you've been well in every other respect then I doubt it's anything 'serious', the worst it could be is a substantial Stomach Ulcer, they'll biopsy your Stomach when you have the Endoscopy (depending on how close they're taken from near the scabby bits the biopsies don't hurt)
Thanku, I hope your right! Stomach pain has died down again now just feels bruised and tender, fingers crossed for my appt tomorrow! Will keep u posted
How much weight have you (unintentionally) lost
Oh A nurse usually just gives you a tick box report after an Endoscopy (with your GP receiving a report in a few weeks), seeing the actual Consultant afterwards would be, er, unheard of, they're far too busy to talk to the mere punters
Hi Rose. Did you ever find out what was causing all if this?
The Paleo diet sounds interesting, have you stayed on that diet ever since?
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
I agree, smaller meals should help. You are making it easier on your digestive system when you eat smaller meals.
He had some students with him and he asked her to wait until they discussed her case. We could hear them through the partition. One said that her mother had gone through a similar episode and had been helped by Aloe Vera. She commented that her mother said that it is expensive but worth it.
Thank you for your message, always interested in hearing other people that have been/or going through a similar thing.
I will have to look into Aloe Vera Capsules, out of interest, what was your reasoning to suggest for her to take the Aloe Vera Capsules? I wonder what is in them that is helping her stomach?
Glad to hear that it is working for her!
I will however look into Aloe Vera also as that sounds positive.
Sorry to here you are going through the same thing
Good luck with your results and getting to the bottom of what is causing your pains.
Hey Jenny, have you looked into Functional Dyspepsia? It physically affects you like gastritis but all tests are negative. It might be worth looking into
I am sorry to hear of your long term frustration and pain. It looks like you may be on the right path now. I am hoping you are doing better with your avoidance of certain foods.
What foods are you avoiding? I would just like to compare with what I am avoiding and see if I am missing anything.
Thanks for your input, hope you continue to have good results!
Dr said gastritis will go away on its own I don't agree.
How are you tested for food allergies?
I believe there is different methods.
Please research this for your self as well. do not just take my word on it. and do not buy off the street as that may have other things laced in it and you do not know the history of how it was grown which causes a risk of doing more harm then help.
BY Taking Cannabis in any form is a mistake! thats the same as TAKING OTHER DANGEROUS PRESCRIPTION PAIN MEDICATIONS! If you wish to COVER UP THE REAL PROBLEM!!! And GET WORSE THEN TAKING CANNABIS and other pain medications would be the route to go!!! But you will be the reason why you get worse!. Competent medical professionals know that prescribing any kind of pain reducer hides the real symtoms of the medical condition and can cause a much later or too late diagnosis. Thus further damaging or in many cases killing the patient! You have to have the common sense to understand this simple fact.
How are you feeling now..any luck??
Sorry to hear your suffering also, its a never ending nightmare isn't it.
Did you try any yoga ? Try some yoga which is specially design for stomach related problems.
And for sure change the diet.
I suggest to start doing yoga [ learn from a professioanl ] and god willing you will get better.
I have heard so much positivity from yoga.
Kidney stones could be another problem but they normally show up!
I think bacteria in the gut is mostly the problem whether it shows up or not, there are so many different types of bacteria they don't always show up!
Try L-glutamine to repair the stomach lining 10-40 grams max and strong probiotics to reestsblish the good bacteria!. HP destroys the stomach lining and Mucosa and the antibiotics reek havoc on your system as they are so strong, they weaken the immune system and kill off all the good and bad bacteria which will change the delicate balance of flora in the body!
Slippery Elm helps protect the stomach too.
Feeling sick , severe pain on right side.dr convinced it was gallstones but scan was clear.
These forums are wonderful places to meet and talk to people and they really do help.
Have you ever had a colonoscopy. Or endoscopy done since having your pain??
Great to hear about this magic, and hope that you will be fine.
Will see what the Doc says later this week.
Sorry your going thru this i definitely know your pain & frustration hopefully we can all be diagnosed soon
This post is old, but wondered where you were at now?
Just so you are aware as well fibroids can grow outside of the uterus so there is a special ultra sound done to help figure out where they are located. But there are some herbs that help with digestive upset. probotics are good as well as achdophlis sorry about the spelling. These help calm the stomach. Chastberry is good to help reduce the fibroids as well. Sometime seeing a natural path helps then the regular doctor
I hope you feel better soon
Out of interest any, what was ur symptoms? Did it sound exactly like mine?
So with regards to seeing if it's fibroids I would need a different ultrasound to what I had is that right?
I am going to book an apt with my gp this week and see what the next step is...
thank you for sharing your problems definitely something for me to think about and get checked
Did you get your endoscopy done or other test to get answer of whats going on ?
Good luck all, lets hope we all get to the bottom of this and QUICK! so we can get our lives back!
Regarding aloe vera my wife finds that the liquid is more effective than the capsules.
Presumably as that is the juice from the plant rather than a powder or gel.
It is surprising the number of products that contain aloe vera nowadays. I've even seen aloe vera treated socks.
When we were in Tobago on holiday a guy carrying aloe vera leaves went round the beach offering to rub them over people whose skin was red from the sun.
If you Google ""Ask the Diet Doctor: The Truth About Aloe Vera Juice""
It has pros and cons about it. Including a scare store about trials on animals with unfiltered gel.
The filtered juice used by humans had a better write up.
But it's not all bad news for aloe vera juice. In a 2004 study from the U.K., researchers gave people with active ulcerative colitis, a type of inflammatory bowel disease, aloe vera gel to drink (remember that in the animal study, they used aloe vera juice, not gel). After four weeks of drinking aloe vera gel in water twice per day, there was a clinical response towards improvement and remission of ulcerative colitis, compared to those given plain water. No significant negative side effects were experienced due to drinking the aloe vera gel.
As you can see, the aloe vera story is not as clear cut as many drink labels want you to believe. My personal recommendation is that you should wait for more human research to show that aloe vera provides significant health benefits without negative side effects. If you do choose to drink aloe vera at this time, check with your doctor first, and then make sure that whatever product you use does not contain Aloin
Thank you very much for your above comments, extremely interesting and definitely worth me speaking to my consultant about!
Out of interest does your wife have any symptoms of her stomach swelling etc anymore? or has the Aloe Vera cured her? if you know what I mean
She had lots of symptoms and pain but never noticeable swelling.
Like others she was left in the lurch by consultants at two hospitals.
Last time she had an endoscopy and a CT scan. There was silence after the CT scan. When she inquired to the consultants secretary she was told that it had been clear. He doctor had been sent the result and said the consultant did not need/plan to see her again.
So infuriating that when comes back clear they leave you as they don't class it as life threatening then!
From Pulse the GP's journal commenting on an apple a day and ginger biscuits!
If only that was true. If the simple ‘Granny Smith’ prevented the swathe of minor ailments that came in each day, I’m sure a GP’s workload would be far better. But did you know that eating an apple daily could stave off the discomfort of acid reflux? And so it would seem can many items found in your local supermarket.
Following on from those episodes, a colleague emailed everyone asking if there were any non-pharmalogical cures for reflux. Homeopathy was mentioned but I suspect a millionth dilution of ‘eye of newt’ or such like is unlikely to cure acid reflux. And that’s where using Dr Google brought up a plethora of websites toting natural remedies for reflux - some of which I had previously heard of such as chewing gum and some that seemed counter-intuitive, but seemed to work, like necking a teaspoon of mustard.
GPs tend to prescribe a lot of medications for common ailments, based on patient demand and the evidence base, but often the horrible side effects can put people off taking the drugs, further leading to re-attendance. I recently found out that a drug I used to prescribe regularly as a hospital doctor, has a less than flattering nickname in some circles because it can make some patients quite paranoid and anxious - not a side effect you want to get just for treating sickness!
Whilst I’m not advocating natural remedies for all ailments, many doctors are probably already suggesting treatments because of previous knowledge or experience, for example sage for menopausal hot flushes, peppermint tea for bowel cramps (peppermint oil is a prescribable drug anyway!), camomile tea for relaxation to name a few. Since the time of Hippocrates, the bark extract of the willow has long been used in medicine for treating inflammation and fever and now is prescribed regularly for secondary prevention in cardiac disease. Any ideas what it is?
If suggesting natural remedies with little or no side effects can improve a patients’ well-being, save the NHS a few pennies and increase my positive feedback rate, I reckon that’s no bad thing!
I haven't seen a post from you in the last couple of months, I hope your pain got better!!
"hello, have you tried to drink cabbage juice ? does it help ? Thanks.
Don't cheat yourself out of this opportunity to finally right your ship. This IS the answer. No medicine is going to help you. You don't need your doctor to do this. You likely have small intestine bacterial overgrowth (SIBO).
"Hiya leanne what are yoir symptoms hun xx?
I know you posted this years ago, but if you are still having trouble, have you tried over the counter Betaine HCl pills? With Gastritis it’s actually possible that you don’t have enough acid in your stomach.
"Could it be gallbladder related?
"Anybody tried Chinese medicine?
Testing for H-Pylori is a good place to start and none invasive as are probiotics. I believe there is also a natural way to eradicate this bug if you don't want to take the antibiotics.
The treatment is 2 types of antibiotics for 1 week and proton pump inhibitors for 3 weeks.
The test for this is a very simple stool test.
H-Pylori? (a common bug which sometimes causes stomach problems).
Have you been tested for
"Ask Dr for zopiclone sleeping tablets All the best Shirley
Good luck and i hope this cures you.
General doctors may not know what's wrong with you, the human body is very complex and doctors may oversee a lot of things, take the doctors advice but trust your own body too. This is your life and in order to be happy you have to get as many second opinions as you can afford. These bugs also sap your seratonin which makes you depressed. So its all worth it to find out whats wrong.
Avoid sugar, which they will use to grow and camouflage from tests. Spicy, greasy, acidic and fried foods will rile them up causing hyper activity. Antacids may also help. You may have to go this diet for a year, until your whole family is treated.
For now eat a strict vegetarian diet, green tea, manuka honey. But you may eat a steak once in a while to up your protein, as h.pylori loves stealing your protein.
My recommendation go to a specialist for parasites who can do a full stool analysis. Parasitology is not that expensive. I would only do this route as it will be more accurate and lease inasive. You may also do a breath test or blood test if you want which are the least expensive.
Based on the symptoms you desribed, the attack sounds like a parasite called h.pylori. which is sometimes difficult to detect, this bacteria lives in your stomach lining and destroys it sapping you from iron and continuing to make all sorts of symptoms. If not treated eventually will lead to stomach cancer at old age. In younger ages, you may develop several ulcers and heal constantly from time to time, so don't panick just yet, because its also curable. Your body will build antigen to fight this parasite, but they will have a fight or flight mode that will hide their precence by hiding under sugar.
What you are experiencing and children are experiencing are parasite infestation, small harmful organisms living in your stomach. This could be one type, or several types of parasites wreaking stomach issues.
"Hi Jenny. I wanted to see
What to do when it flares up especially at the middle of the night? Please advise.
"Donna has anyone tested your lipase with a blood test? High lipase usually means pancreas problem. 80 percent is alcohol caused while 20 percent is bacteria toxins like lipitor for lowering cholesterol. Also in that 20 percent the doctor can't define the cause. Lookup fodmap diet, gluten-free and lactose free. Also if you have any auto immune issues that could be a factor. Cheers Gipsy
"Ooh that's good to know! Sound
"Ahh yes, like yoghurt but fermented. You can make it at home with a culture. Also make it with coconut milk for dairy free. Cheers Gipsy
"Nope its actually a milk fermented with a special bacteria, not entirely sure, and it sounds gross, but you should google it slippery elm bark sounds interesting though. Good luck
"By the way, beware the antacids, doctors regularly goto this and unfortunately it can make things worse. Gastro can often be because your acids are LOW and antacid is a nono. Get the doc to check if you are vitamin B12 deficient.
she had through xray, ultrasound, endoscopy , all normal.
Much love and hopefull outcomes. I hope I could help even just a tiny bit. Xoxo
Try what ever mental counceling or pills they offer. At this point, it's worth trying. Even if you got for it and it doesn't work you still WIN. You still had the guts to head straight into something that might frighten you. That bravery will take you places. And if it doesn't help that's when you put that middle finger up to the docs and yell HELP ME NOW! It's the game we unfortunately have to play to be heard. In the end it might just help the despair you feel and you can let your mind be a little free, and at ease while the focus is directed back to the actually problem you might have.
You are not alone. I know the worst kind of sad is not being able to explain why. Or being in pain and feeling like you're being called a liar. But you're stronger than you let yourself be. Be gentle with yourself, you're doing the best you can. Sometimes what you are most afraid of doing is the very thing that will set you free.
Negative thinking leads to negative emotions. Train your mind to be positive. Meditate, chakra, go see a counselor. There are options. And it's never too late.
""Everything will be okay in the end. If it's not okay, it's not the end.""
Pray you find answers soon.
"I am sorry you are suffering so. Where exactly is the pain? Have you had an ultrasound of your gall bladder? Have you had an endoscopy? Have you tried a FODMAP diet? Can you switch docs?
"I don't know if this will help but google this; Acute Intermittent Porphyria . Maybe it can tie some lose ends together or simply test yourself for this. Might not be the answer you want but it could be an answer. Many doctors miss this. Worth a shot.
If you could get back to me asap i would be extremely grateful.
"I'm sorry you're experiencing such pain and stress. You should also ask your doc to order an ultrasound of your gallbladder.
"Sorry for the grammar/punctuation.
"Hi Jenny, I hope you get some good news soon!
"Could it be caused by any medication that you are taking or perhaps a change in your diet
Good luck and I hope you find som relief!
"Take your self to A&E of no one is willing to help, we never know what's going on inside so it's better to be safe
"Jenny can I ask are you still the same or better now?
Hope you get sorted Jenny x
Hopefully you get things sorted. If I do get any further with some answers I will post on here.
Other problem you find with all these websites is people always put what's wrong but rarly come back with solutions of what is wrong.
"Hi Frank, very frustrating isn't it. Nice when results all come back clear and nothing sinister but still no closer to sorting out the problem.
Just wondered how you are and if you got to the bottoms of it.
http://patient.uservoice.com/knowledgebase/articles/398331-private-messages
Emis Moderator comment: I have removed the email address as we do not publish these in the forums. If users wish to exchange contact details please use the Private Message service.
You may not have it but it's something for some reason that doctors don't seem to think of.
i wish everyone who got this pain get well soon. And please keep forwarding for any tips that might help
Have u had any relief?
I was wondering if you've managed to find any solution to the pain?
Glad to see someone is on the forum today, I'm spending today scouring the Internet for info and got notified there was a response to read. Have you been to a doctor recently?
What I would recommend (and I have no doubt you've done your fair share of this) is continue to haunt the Internet for ideas based upon your symptoms and then haunt your doctor to work with you. Hopefully we've found a GI doc who seems to actually be interested in helping people rather than just randomly trying drugs and then bailing out.
Please keep me posted on your progress and your adventures in the world of gastric. Take care and keep trying ... there's a solution, I'm sure.
Hi, did you ever get better or at least a diagnosis?
Good luck everyone! If anyone has anymore good tips or advise, it will be more than appreciated!
It is kind of funny how common this problem is and yet everyone who goes through this has a very similar experience.
Endless trial and error with no real answers or assistance from physicians.I believe this problem is caused primarily by the preservatives, the GMO's, the BPA and all the other man made chemicals they've created to make our food taste better or last longer.
I hope that one day they are able to treat people of theses unbearable issues. I hope everyone here can find relief in some way and any helpful info on this matter would be appreciated
I definately understand all of your frustrations.
Good luck to you all - PLEASE keep us all posted if any of you get a miracle cure!'
Oh great, thanks for the update Maria! That does sound positive! I really do hope they get to the bottom of your husbands stomach problems!
I have never done this before on a site, Are you still suffering because I maybe able to help? or at least give you another idea that maybe you can check up on. It may have been covered I'm not sure but please reply if you want
Can you message me about your suggestions? Chronic gastritis sufferer, hpylori neg, clean diet, no stress, and PPIs cause pain, not help.
Did you find any answer or solution to your situation?
Next step he said is capsule camera! basically a tablet that you swallow that has a camera in it and takes images throughout its journey through your digestive system! amazing ay!
Now its another waiting game to wait for this appt to come through.
Will keep you all posted! the never ending journey continues!
Did is you ever take the aloe?
Sorry to read you are also suffering, its unbelievable how many people seem to have very simular syphtoms and also struggling for a diagnosis! Frightening really!
I hope you find some answers/relief soon also !
I've read through everyone's post and i'm so sorry to hear you are all going through immense pain or uncomfortable times.
Strange with all the technology, and continously people having these systom.
Sorry not much help and not saying that the out of places organs were the cause, nor that everyone else has the same, but maybe an option to bring up to your doctor. You never know.
Oh really! What relief that you have a diagnosis! thank you for sharing your story and keeping us informed.
good luck everyone really appreciate reading your comments
You were experiencing stomach/digestive problems after a broad spectrum antibiotic? What was your experience ?
You should ask your doctor for a blood test for coeliac disease. The link explains the test and also explains about coeliac disease.
take lunch (curd rice without salt for one week )if u hv peptic ulcer they will cure easily after one week and avoid spicy food ,tea,coffe and take food proper time
Never heard of curd rice and nowhere sells it. Never heard of an ulcer being cured in a week either.
take one week diet analysis, note that which day ur good stomach and note bad stomach day also find and list which diet ur taken bad and good finally ur analysis ur fit for which type of food and take that avoid others (i used pantoprazole40mg early morning empty stomach and take albendazole tablets400mg one day night for deworming and consult ur doctor about this drug } u told this problem after taking garlic so i think ur not fit for some food so analysis that food so avoid that ,any stress increse acid secretion (ur mind thing about this also increse acid secretion)
did u take any investigation related this proplem
I maybe able to suggest something if you are still suffering
Thank you for messaging. How interesting, did you feel unwell on a daily basis or was it intermitant?
Interesting that you say by stopping fizzy drinks helped you... has it stopped your syptoms all together?
However i am definately prepared to stop drinking the sprite if that helped you!
It is the most horrible thing in the world having something wrong with you and not knowing what it is and not having anything to make you feel better. It really does ruin your life as that is all you think about.
I will look forward to hearing from you regarding the above, and thanks again for sharing with me.
Yeah I think they tell you IBS because thats the only thing they can think of. Stomach issues are the worse. Keep your head up.
How long did it take from stopping drinking the fizzy for your syptoms to go away out of interst?
Yes they really are could literally be anything thats the problem
Sorry, I should clarify, if your daughter feels the same as me, deep breathing alone won't fix this as I'm sure you know ðŸ˜… good luck!
Anyway I still don't know exactly what the problem is but I am getting closer, so don't give up if you are still experiencing pain. In my experience most doctors don't listen and they will never spend as much time as you researching your symptoms. Because you are not dying anytime within the month, therefore you are not that high in their priority list. So you have to be your own advocate.
I am sorry to read that your son is suffering. As I am sure you have gathered from this thread and simular ones the problem is the symptoms we all seem to have literally could be caused by a list of things This is why it is so hard to diagnose!
Kept a food diary to see if it was food related
Went on a wheat and gluten free diet for a month
Cut out fizzy drinks
I recommend you try the above (on seperate occassions) to see if any of them help.
As you were on the medicine for 'only' 6 months, i suppose your withdrawal will not last that long, and you will feel better soon.
try not to pay too much attention to the anxiety, and rest and sleep well if possible.
Interesting to read your reply to Rachael, Did you taper, and what was your method please?
What was your final dose, the last dose you took before stopping completely? Did you do it like Kathryn did, dropping a day a week etc?
"Well done Emma your nearly there, remember the feelings your having are only temperary and will definitely pass
I think not many people talk on the internet if they have come off them ok that's why we only here the horror stories hopefully .
Just wondered how you are doing now since stopping them as it's hard for me to find anybody who has been on them as long as we have and have withdrawn successfully.
"Thanks and it's good to know it can be done .
"Come join our Facebook page, lookup ppwindowrepairs and ask to be added. We have a wealth of info between us
"Struggling to find that facebook page ?
"i am also struggling to find that page, does it definately come under that name? as all i can find for that ppwindowrepairs is actual windows
"Hi Mikeyboy, Just wondered how you are doing now since stopping the mirt. Hopefully everything is still good.
"I'm glad you are fine. My doctor tells me that you should only taper down if you are taking 30 mg or more. When you get to 15 mg take it for 3-4 weeks then stop altogether. She says it can cause problems if you taper down from 15 mg. She did explain but i didn't really understand what she said! I have great faith in her though. She's very experienced.
"Hi! How are you doing now? Hopefully better!
"Can I send you a request too Craig?
The doc didn't believe me and said I'd just googled the symptoms..I wish.
I hope you feel better quickly and settle down with the new drugs.
Any comments would be greatly appreciated.
Many thanks for your time
"How are your symptoms now?
hope you get your symptoms sorted out. Interested to know outcome
"Where are you now with withdrawal
"Hang in there Michelle! Its all withdrawls...it will pass. Congrats on getting off of the mirt. Stay positive.
Bye all, and good luck in your situations.
"Lots of people here can relate. Stay connected, but not absorbed. Sometimes out of sight, out of mind. Things are so mental. God Bless
"You poor thing, i feel so awful for you having all these symptoms. Are they really coming from mirtaz withdrawal,do you think. You are having a really rough ride. I would be interested to hear what neurology say about it all as i do think that drs are in denial about this med.
i do hope you get a conclusion soon.
Please post when you do.
wish these people knew what they were doing.
"Just wanted to jump on here and say a couple of things. Firstly, Steve (and everyone else here) it sounds like you're all having a really rough time. Everyone's bodies handle this stuff so differently and it's hard to know how each person is going to react. It's important to keep in mind that we all have different body make-ups so one person's experience will never be exactly the same as the next. Although it is comforting to hear of other people experiencing similar things. We also only tend to hear the horror stories because people don't really post about that on forums like this.
"Did you manage to get off this mirtazapine with your taper
"How did the withdrawel go from post of 4 months ago?
wondering how you are getting on now a month has gone by and if you got any further with the investigations as to why coming off mirtaz has been so bad for you. I hope you are feeling better and can manage without this med. maybe they have given you a newer one to help. Do let us know how you are.
Hope you’re feeling ok.
"Hi Steve are they external shake or internal tremors?
"I know your post is a year old,but would like to know how you got on with your mirtazapine journey,did you manage to stay off this drug?and if so,how long before all withdrawels settled? did you get insomnia? hope you are well.
"Hows your withdrawal going?
do you feel any better without it?
you are doing so well,and will be off this drug very soon,it's not doing you any good from what you say,so you will be better either when off this drug and withdrawels have gone,or you try a new medication that will work.
"Ann there is definatley hope out thre for you,just concentrate on one thing at a time,getting off this drug as its doing you know good anyway,and from what others have posted,it may take while for all withdrawels settle.then you and your psychiatrist can decide best way forward together.
Try not to think too far ahead,and take one day at a time.
"Hi Toria, im a bit of a dinosaur, can you tell me how to get onto the mirtazapine facebook, i think it may be of help
Go into FB. Go to search bar at top of screen. Type in mirtazapine withdrawl support group. It should pop up as a selection.
Message Toria Stockford on FB. Thanks
"Hi Gretel I've tried the FB link you gave me for Toria and can't find her can you please help me any further sorry for being thick x
Contact Toria Stockford on Facebook. In order to do that you’ll need to have a Facebook account.
Once you have an account, search for “Toria Stockford” and message her a request to join her Mirtazapine Withdrawal Support Group.
"Hi Jo tried this and don't seem to be getting anywhere , has she got longish dark hair
Yes she has hair like that. Just message her and she will add you.
"Hi teresa, there is a mirt w/d support group on fb. Thanks, gretel
"Wonder how you’re doing now Steve?
Been a few months since you last posted. Still having mirtz w/d effects?
roughest point to get past so perhaps the answer is - BE PREPARED for some pain with this awful drug.
"what have you dropped from and to and how long were you taking it for?
Thanks for your interest.
So sorry to hear you are not feeling the best.
Hoping your Dr can come up with something to give you some relief.
I think you should go to the emergency dept and see what they think.
How much were you on? How long?
"How is your knee now after over a year?
ACL & LCL Ligament repairs left knee April 2016
TKR Nov 2014 right knee
Hope this helps you and anybody else in pain.
Sleep deprivation is a major downside of recovery. Sometimes your Dr may prescribe something to help you sleep or you could try Kalms herbal tablets.
Its important to do the exercises the physio told you.
Keep your leg up as much as possible, with icing, take pain killing meds every 4 hrs.
Recovery after TKR can take between 6 months to 2 years.
Please ring the ward you was on or your Dr's surgery for info about meds.
just take it easy first of all sounds as though your going at a thousand miles an hour exersie when you can little steps dont overdo it listen to your body rest whe you can give yourself time this is a marathon not a sprint you will see improvements as the weeks go by.
I'm not superman just dertimied ??????
Talk to you again soon!😊
"Would LOVE hearing how you are doing as you progress through the healing process!😊
You are still very early in the game. Focus on small improvements rather than ""SHOULD"" be able to --------. Be patient with yourself , and get as much rest as you can. Rest HEALS, and rest provides a more positive outlook!
Swelling is very common, and ice doesn't always help lessen it unfortunately. Try thigh-high compression stockings and elevating your leg (use a looped belt over your foot to help lift the leg) higher than your heart.
The body has been through A LOT. Healing takes awhile because there is a great deal cut and moved and glued and sewn and traumatized during surgery.
"Yes, it DOES get better!😊
"As I suggested above - what were you like for range of movement say a year before the operation. Could you do 118 deg then?
Good luck with your knees and best wishes,
All of this is critical really. It would appear that some are relatively young and had the op because of pain to others who were older and effectively crippled with twisted distorted legs (me!). The expectations will probably be different in each case.
3. Most people are not giving their age and what the reason was for their op and what their range of movement etc was before.
2. Different things work for some but not for others
1. Each one of us is completely different
"There is some very good advice on this thread but there is one very clear conclusion which should be heeded.
"Have you used a different lotion or soap?
Please let us know how things go!
Check with your doctor if your answers to these are ""Yes"".
Do you have a fever?
Are the bumps on your incision itchy?
Try wearing compression hose on both legs ( thigh high). Try laying on your bed with both legs stretched up the headboard of your bed. (Use a looped belt to help elevate them to the position.) If you can, try Ibuprofen. It does an AWESOME job in my opinion of lessening swelling.
We take our chances with each surgery, but in the end each surgery is different even though they are on our same body.
"Expect pain for at least 4 weeks. Bad pain. Then, it just starts to get better and by about 6-7 weeks, almost zero pain.
"Sorry Ann, I guess I had you sorted as the newest first
ask your doctor for something stronger than paracetamol if you are struggling with pain.
"Hi Pam, chin up, its early days yet. I think you can drive after 6 weeks, depending what your consultant/physio says.
"I had tkr on the 2 1 2016 and reading as many comments as I can it appears we all agree broadly on all the problems ie pain,heat in the joint, transferred pain to the shin and thigh, clicking and clunking in the joint and the overall pain and discomfort.
Promise it will get better. We all did this for the ulitmate outcome and that is to get back to healthy living and you will
Congratulations on your determination! You will succeed with whatever you do, I can just tell! Good attitude with a lot of persistence goes a long way to create successful outcomes. Thank you for inspiring us all to hang in there!
i wish you all a speedy recovery but what will be, will be.
Best to you as you recover and prepare for #2!!
You will do fine with your second replacement and may find it goes easier because you will know what to expect.
"You are doing great! Glad that the PAIN meds help.
It will come! Encourage him to be patient! Please update us from time to time on his progress!
Swelling has a lot to do with success of movement. Be sure your husband ices his knee top and bottom frequently throughout the day. This helps. Also, sitting back in a hard chair with arms provides better support as he is trying to effect good movement.
Keep up with the exercises, good luck
I just wanted to post this for everyone going through a tough time that there is light at the end of the tunnel and it will just keep getting better and better as you go along, it will just take time. Best of luck to you all!
Now to catch up on my past history!
"My original response went to moderation because I included a web site link, so following is a copy without the direct link in case the original gets bounced.
Can I ask where you had the operation?
"Hi there. Your TKR sounds really interesting and you're doing so well!
"Hi Sally thanks for info I will look into one of those. How long is it since you had you surgery?
i hope it's a pain free one for all of us on this Forum
"Happy New Year to you too
make sure you take your meds regularly and ice frequently too
the first few weeks are a roller coaster
it's not nice but then something else takes your mind off it
i think most of us experienced that in the early days.
I wonder if anyone/hospital gave you any information or idea of what to expect after the op?
I would certainly mention the deep pain/ache in your leg to GP/Hosp just to rule out any problem.
Are you doing leg exercises? use Ice pack or peas (can burn skin) wrap in a tea towel. Use after exercises it will take the swelling down and feels good.
GO AND ASK ABOUT THE PAIN IN YOUR LEG
Thank you for your wonderful response to your experience during this long and sometimes painful process.
I know how hard it is. I am glad that you can do most of the exercises.
Haha! Yeah it REALLY sucks not having any strength in you leg.
Just keep trying. It will come. Guaranteed.
Clicking is not something to worry about and will fade with time.
My advice is EXERCISE, EXERCISE AND EXERCISE. Work through the pain, use an ice machine after working out for 15 minutes.
Hope all went well for you !!!
How much could you bend your knee before the operation?
A TKR is one of the most painful surgeries a person can have. All of us feel bad about your pain and can empathise with you too. Do you have someone to help you? Don't hesitate to call the district nurses or NHS 24 if you need them out of hours. They are fantastic people and they are there to help you. I've had to call them several times, now. Use lots of ice to get the swelling down and although it seems trivial, wiggle your toes often and do your exercises when you can. I'm not a person who cries much but I've done a lot of crying with this one. If you can't sleep at night try to rest during the day if you can. Keep posting and tell us how you're doing as the days go by. Little improvements make us all happy. We wish you well. An NHS 24 doctor got my pain under control and I am extremely grateful to him.
Start by using the foot on your good leg to help lift the bad leg. Bend your ankles back on both legs 20 times an hour. It will come around.
You have to get up and walk. The pain becomes less with more movement. Every day you don't move makes it much worse in the long run.
Don't get discouraged. I was finally able to lift my leg 15 days after surgery. Your body is trying to heal from very painful surgery. All of us are different and we are not in a contest. There needs to be a balance between pain meds, ice, rest, ice, exercise, ice, etc. I wish you the best.
good luck to you ! keep up with the excercises and ice , elevate and walk !!!!
What is manipulation surgery?
Make sure you don't get stomach issues with the Diclofenac.
Taking a good multivitamin that has 100% of the daily recommended dose of iron also helps with being more energetic instead of tired.
Be sure to keep hydrated. Also 2000 mg. of Omega 3 (fish oil gels) help with the joints.
Be patient. Around six weeks I think you will find that everything starts to get easier.
Rest when you can, and do good breathing in and out to get oxygen to your body. When we are in pain we tend to breathe in a very shallow way.
Best wishes to you as you continue your recovery!
Hi Cheryl, thanks for the tips, I will try all you have suggested, nice to have support x
You learn a lot if you listen to your body. A lot of the time that's hard to do because we humans are REALLY IMPATIENT and want results and improvements IMMEDIATELY!
I am learning to accept that some days will be better than others, flexibility will vary, swelling comes for no apparent reason and often leaves for no apparent reason as well, and some days I have oodles of energy while on other days I am a LAZY LUCY.
Good luck to you with your recovery!
Watch when they remove each staple. Make sure no skin is pinched in the puller!
I had a quick recovery in regard to movement, I was at 120 degrees by 6 weeks post surgery, however, I have a terrible problem with severe swelling. Went for an ultrasound and no blood clots thank goodness, just it looks twice the size of my other leg. It's also very stiff, but the more I walk and do my exercises the better it feels, until it swells again. Elevation and lots of ice for me. I thought by 14 weeks I would be as good as new, but I'm told I could have stiffness and swelling for 12 months! Glad I had it done, but if the other knee needs replacing, I'll really have to be in agony before doing this again.
Just need to ask about were to put ice on sides I no but is it alright to put it over the staples as well x
Thank you so much wishing you all the best Wishes and love and light ❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️❤️
Anxiety to be honest has been no different didn’t help even when on them really.
thanks for this all and keep it up <a href=""https://pickshayari.blogspot.com[/b]"">bro</a>
How are you doing now Calvary I didn't cope well with my withdrawal from mitrazapine xx
many thanks for reply hope you are doing well will keep fingers crossed .
Hi again Vikki
If you private message me (setup is in ""settings"") I can then help you join our FB support group.
Please private message me.
hi can you send me the link to the FACEBOOK SUPPORT GROUP THANKS
You have a private message from me.
I would love to join a w/d group!
If you want to join a Mirtazapine W/D support group, please private message me.
Can i ask if u changed too another ad x
Oh and thank you, hopefully you feel better yourself too soon.
Hi Rachael if you read my comment on down a bit it might help you
I have tried to send you a facebook message to get onto new site, having difficulty trying to get into site. Have you had a message from me?
When you say dr supervised you, i think mine will too, just wondered if you did it a bit at a time.
Gotcha, hope your experience of getting off them is similar to Gretels where it’s fairly easy.
I am, its Gretel who has stopped it
I hope today isnt too bad for you.
Thanks for that info about Buspar, they havent tried it on me yet, is it in uk?
I suspect there are very few, if any, doctors or psychiatrists that really know exactly what these drugs do to our brains and body.
CBT is group now I'm booked in but not going as they put me in a trauma one, and counselling they normally only give if you're suicidal x
Funny i was going to ask the same thing. Same here i tried, didnt work. Thinking of trying again, my options are limited.
The down side is you have to take it a couple times a day because it has a short half life.
Maybe ask your Psych about it if you haven’t already?
It’s an odd drug in that some people it works on and some it doesn’t (50/50). Some people have to take high doses for it to work and some only works on low dose, so you have to play with it.
P.S. We’re on Toria’s FB page (Mirtazapine withdrawal support Group) and we miss you there. ❤️
Okay, thank you. For me it never helped but made me feel worse too. Effin POS drug.
Thanks Ann. So sorry about the tooth ache. Maybe place a wet tea bag on it to help with the swelling?
Can I ask, did mirtz ever help you for purposes of why you took it in the first place?
i think its helpful to keep in touch to see how were doing, please feel free to get in touch any time and good luck.
Are you saying a person in the UK can now only get group therapy, there’s no individual therapy?
CBT would help but the problem is now in the U.K. It's only group therapy 😑 X
You respond out loud with “I am a good person.” Then again with “I am a REALLY good person”.
Your brain starts the cycle by starting negative thoughts and keeps at it by providing evidence why it’s to be feared or felt negatively.
Do you guys also have back to back negative thoughts? One after another type thing?
I agree! May be a good idea to come up with preordained positive thoughts. They do come on fast! But that method has been the most effective for me.
So if I tried to counter every negative thought with a positive one, which I have, I would need to have a huge list of positive thoughts ready and waiting.
Mirtazapine withdrawal support group x
Great! Whats the page name?
Whilst our primary objective is to connect people that have issues regarding depression and anxiety, we also warmly welcome others that may have health issues that are related to depression and anxiety.
we also actively encourage those that live with, or care for someone with depression and/or anxiety to partake in this community in order that they learn more about these health concerns.
This website is independent, non profit making and is free for all to use.
Dedicated to depression, anxiety and other related health issues, these forums are user friendly, supportive and welcoming.
Depression is a common topic for research papers in psychology classes.
Everyone experiences times when they feel a little bit blue or sad. This is a normal part of being human.
Depression, however, is a medical condition which is quite different from everyday moodiness.
There are several different types of depression that are dependent on how an individual's depression symptoms manifest themselves.
Depression symptoms may vary in severity or in what is causing them.
The possible causes of depression are many and not yet well understood. However, it is most likely that depression results from an interplay of genetic vulnerability and environmental factors
how does an imbalance in brain chemistry or poor nutrition relate to depression? Is there a relationship between the stressful, busier lives of today's society and the rise of depression?
Certain risk factors may make a person more prone to developing depression, such as a family history of depression, adverse childhood experiences, stress, illness, and gender. This is not a complete list of all risk factors, however, it's a good place to start.
The growing rate of depression in children, teenagers, and young adults is an interesting subtopic you can focus on as well.
An illness such as depression is often invisible to the outside observer. That is why it is very important for patients to make an accurate accounting of all of their symptoms so their doctor can diagnose them properly.
While there are certain laboratory tests which can be performed to rule out other medical illnesses as a cause of depression, there is not yet a definitive test for depression itself.
The first choice for depression treatment is generally an antidepressant medication. Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) are the most popular choice because they can be quite effective and tend to have fewer side effects than some older antidepressants.
Psychotherapy, or talk therapy, is another effective and common choice. It is especially efficacious when combined with antidepressant therapy.
The topic of depression really can take you down many different roads. When making your final decision on which to pursue for your paper, it's often helpful to begin listing a few areas that pique your interest.
Stomach pain or discomfort after eating has many causes. If stomach pain happens after eating and then goes away, it is usually caused by food.
If a person has other symptoms or ongoing discomfort despite making changes to their diet, it may be a medical condition.
Stomach pain can be prevented by an individual eating a balanced, healthful diet with fresh fruits and vegetables. Not eating spicy or fatty foods and cutting down on sugary drinks or caffeine, may also help.
Food poisoning normally only lasts a few days. It can usually be treated at home with rest and fluids.
Finding alternatives, such as replacing fruit juices with water or tea, may help to cut down on stomach pain.
Trapped wind in the digestive tract can cause discomfort. The stomach may feel stretched and uncomfortable, or there may be a sharp pain.
Chili peppers are often used to flavor spicy food. They contain capsaicin, a chemical that causes the hot or burning sensation. Capsaicin may irritate sensitive parts of the body, including the stomach.
A person can suffer indigestion after eating or drinking. As well as stomach ache, they may feel bloated or sick.
Caffeine is a stimulant found in tea and coffee. It can irritate the stomach and cause discomfort for some people.
People can choose alternatives and still enjoy hot drinks. Decaffeinated tea and decaffeinated coffee are available online. Fruit teas or hot water with a slice of lemon are also healthful to help people stay hydrated during the day.
Alcoholic drinks can cause bloating. This is especially true if they are carbonated, such as beer or sparkling wine. They may also make heartburn worse.
If someone cuts down on the amount of alcohol they drink, it can have many health benefits. Drinking a soft drink or water between alcoholic ones or choosing alcohol-free wine or beer are ways to reduce alcohol consumption.
An intolerance is a milder form of an allergy. Both allergies and intolerances can be caused by many different foods.
self-disclosure occurs when there are incidental (unplanned) encounters outside the office, spontaneous verbal or non-verbal reactions, or other planned and unplanned occurrences that happen to reveal therapists’ personal information to their clients
Clients’ deliberate actions are also potential sources that can reveal personal information about the therapists. Clients can initiate inquiries about their therapist by conducting a simple Web search
Discussions of psychotherapist self-disclosure dates back to the earliest years of psychotherapy.
On the professional front dovetailing with the humanistic, feminist and self-help movements, several new approaches to therapeutic self-disclosure surfaced towards the end of the 20th century and at the beginning of the 21st.
Authors from orientations, such as behavioral, cognitive and cognitive-behavioral, have discussed the therapeutic benefits of self-disclosure from the angle of their particular modality
The attitude towards therapeutic self-disclosure is closely related to the therapist’s primary theoretical orientation.
Generally, highly disclosing therapists viewed the focus of the psychotherapy process as an interconnection between the therapist and the patient, whereas less disclosing therapists focused on working through patients’ projections
Self-disclosure has a unique importance for therapists working psychotherapeutically with patients who hold particular religious or spiritual beliefs.
There are a number of concerns that are associated with self-disclosure. The one most commonly cited is that self-disclosure is not done for clinical-therapeutic purposes or for the client’s benefit but rather for the therapist’s.
As with any decision regarding boundary crossing, the decision to self-disclose is based first and foremost on the welfare of the client.
Self-disclosure is a process of communication by which one person reveals information about themself to another. The information can be descriptive or evaluative, and can include thoughts, feelings, aspirations, goals, failures, successes, fears, and dreams, as well as one's likes, dislikes, and favorites.
Social penetration theory states that the development of a relationship is closely linked to systematic changes in communication. Relationships generally begin with the exchange of superficial information and gradually move on to more meaningful conversations.
In order to develop a more intimate relationship, partners must increase the breadth and depth of their conversations. Breadth includes the variety of topics two people discuss and depth is the personal significance of these topics.
Reciprocity is a positive response from the person with whom one is sharing information, whereby the person who received the disclosure self-discloses in turn. Self-disclosure usually influences whether two people will want to interact again.
Being shy decreases self-disclosure. Among men, those who are or appear more "tough" are less likely to disclose and express themselves.
Motivation for disclosure is also critical: does the individual need to present himself or herself in a certain way in order to gain certain benefits, and does the self-disclosure match the person's sense of ideal self?
I think people all around the world need someone to love them and help them in case of any need
Thank you for sharing your stories. I hope you get better as soon as possible
Thanks Ashley.\nMy point was that, in some cases, the symptoms get worse and simple daily tasks become more and more difficult, until the point that you no longer become an independent person. When you're that bad, you don't even realize how bad it is.
That's interesting. In most (if not all) brain fog cases, the MRIs return negative, i.e. there is nothing wrong with the \"hardware\" of your brain.
Brain inflammation isn't visible in the blood when there isn't a bacteria or virus involved (at least not with the conventional test via a GP). If you google on 'brain inflammation' and 'natural remedies' you will find lots of information on foods, supplements and herbs which can help in reducing brain inflammation.
Hi have you been tested for fibromyalgia?
Hi cody are you still soing treatment for lyme ?
Thank you for the article and to the moderators for allowing me to still see the title even tho the link was removed, that would explain a lot
You best get checked for Lyme's then, though you may be infected and still get a negative outcome since the tests used by GP's are rubbish.\nIf you're planning to keep using antibiotics don't just use doxycycline, but combine it with metronidazole or even better: tinidazole.\nDoxycycline on its own just kills the active form of Borrelia, it doesn't eradicate the hidden form.
You're not alone. Thanks for the reply, it's good to hear from you! & I understand exactly what you're saying.
Hi rebekah, TMS is not that new, there has been done research for about 20 years and up to now no permanent side effects have been observed. It's mainly used for persistent major clinical depression, and I doubt we with our complaints could benefit from it. I think the source of our complaints is physiological, some kind of infection like in my case Lyme disease, and/or the effect of something environmental, like Wifi, cell towers, pollution or whatever.
Have you tried the fisher Wallace device? It's suppose to be like tmz but much cheaper and safer. You have to keep occupied at all times in ordered to not think about it. I also believe it can go away naturally. God created the body so complex and I believe it has the ability to heal itself.
Does anyone deep down just want to try and let this feeling go away naturally?
Do u have visual issues too like seeing vivid colors n shadows.. ??
Study and work your brain!! Read more and gain knowledge. Practice imagining and recalling stuff! Eat healthy. Exercise and sleep well. Try to relief stress whenever possible and eat vitamins. These should help
Did you find anything that makes it better ,?
That's awesome your doing better. Praise Jesus
Damn. Have you had any other progress at all?
Did anyone here ever see an endocrinologist or get their thyroid checked?
There is no cure, it's a normal part of general anxiety, if the anxiety is properly managed, then it will lessen too. There is no pill to stop it
No but I will keep you in my prayers
Taylor, I'm very sad to read about the pain you've gone through. I can only hope that the tiTelling someone with a chronical illness they maybe 'need more motivation' is probably one of the worst remarks you can make.\
me that has passed since your last post has brought you some answers and some relief.
Do you get a numbing feeling from the front of your head to the back ? Like a line of a numbing feeling?
Hi there sweetheart sounds like depersonalization and derealization
Thank you for your very kind response. You are a caring soul. I have searched feverishly on the internet through all this as well. I finally typed in a different way and you popped up like God let me find your post when I needed to see something that could connect me.
There is definitely inflammation going on, it's low grade though, and therefore difficult to test.
I think you have made a very good and important point here. I think there is a blood test available for inflammtion in the body but then the problem is, what do we do about it to change it? It is quite shocking to see how widespread this affliction is and hope it is not something that has been introduced into the public for purposes of \"evil\", like Hitler and the flouride before WW2......
No one here has mentioned inflammation. It appears many studies have found that inflammation can cause symptoms of Depression. These symptoms sound exactly like brain fog. As others have mentioned, brain fog seems to be a type of Depression. The brain fog is caused by cytokines which are triggered from inflammation.
Thanks for your reply. I haven't heard of any risks, when they give you a booklet they just tell you what it is and about it. Not what could happen. The doc did said their were some people that had seizures from it but supposedly the ones that had them were either smoking weed or drinking alcohol while doing treatments.. that's the only thing I've heard with that. I'm all for getting another opinions but idk who to even ask lol. But you're right about that.
I've never heard of this. Yes it would be great if it worked, expensive if it didn't. And what are the risks?! Definitely get other opinions. I'll look into it. Sorry your going through this.What are everyone's opinions on TMS treatments? My doc said with my symptoms of the \"brain fog\" dream state, not feeling really in the world are signs of depression but there are different types.
I can completely identify with your descriptions above about the simplification of language etc. Guess our greatest fears these days are of having Alzheimer's but I can't believe that we all have it and it such varying ages. Sometimes I almost think that there has been experiments for decades with the general public and what we eat and breathe etc. to see how we function and if it is somehow a way to \"control the masses.
its anxiety, just anxiety - it does all these things and more. It really will exhaust you looking for a magical or religious answer when there simply isnt one. All these problems are well know, documented and proven to be from anxiety. Treating the root anxiety will help, trying to chase the neverending list of symptoms simply will not work. Its very much up to you of course, but thats just how it is from an evidentual point of view
Dear all,\nI have just found this discussion and I am hoping that together we could find a cure or at least understand more about this.
This was me over the last few years. But some things helped me but you have to maintain your self.\nstart keeping a journal this will help you with your memory.\nStart eating right, eat lots of fruit and veg this will help your body and mind feel better.\nStart doing excercice like cycleing or running (but running takes time to get used to) This will help your mind and body but make sure you have 2/3 days off a week.\nIf you do drugs, cut down to 2x a week or even better once a week.\nStart to do creative stuff like making music, drawing or memes this will make you think.\nStop worrying and being paranoid this will only make things worse.\nTry to keep your mind occupied, i would say get a job if you dont have one or be productive.\nIf you do all this i promise your life will get better but it is hard work.
And so I tell you, keep on asking, and you will receive what you ask for. Keep on seeking, and you will find. Keep on knocking, and the door will be opened to you. For everyone who asks, receives. Everyone who seeks, finds. And to everyone who knocks, the door will be opened.
Hi I just wondered is there anything that people can take for this or eat that can help.
You all have classical symptoms of hypothyroidism.\nSometimes it's not easily detectable in the blood or doctors have little clue how to see beginning hypothyroidism by bloodtest.\nI advise anyone to inform yourselves this disease
First off I'd like to say I'm sorry that you're going through this. Secondly I believe that this is some form of depression.
Hi alan what meds made you feel better ?
Hi alan, I'm sorry you have to go through all this. I hope the psychiatrist can help in getting some peace of mind, though your own plan sounds great: mediation and taking care of the Self are great ways to find your way back to that restful place.
You're welcome carmen. while you're at it you might as well want to ask for a vit.D test. A deficiency is much more common than people think, especially in the more Northern regions of the Earth, and it also can cause brainfog, memory problems etc.
Oh my goodness. That's awful! I'm so sorry! Have you ever been tested for mono (Epstein Barr Virus)?
Have you tried antidepressants, anti anxiety, therapy, lifestyle changes, or diet changes?
I`m wondering oif any of you guys had any luck doing excercise during your periods of brain fog/ mental decline. Maybe it might help?
Hi Brain, you're welcome again. Apparently our complaints aren't that unique after all, considering the huge amount of comments on Taylors' post. What I find peculiar in this is that it seems to be an epidemy, but I don't see messages about it in any other media.
that's such a hard and frustrating way to live. Trying an antidepressant or anti anxiety may definitely help. The holy basil is a great start. Have you looked into Ashwagandha? It's one of the best adaptogens.
Thank you Linda for that response. This is all so very helpful, encouraging, and therapeutic!
thank you for this terrific thread. Keep us posted on how you are doing.
How is it going for you once you can try to relax, like at home watching TV for example. Is that any better for you?
So your vision is like looking into a flash light then having that after image of distortion ?
You mentioned multiple blood tests, did they included testing for food allergies, your thyroid, adrenal functions? Cortisol levels? One factor could inflammation in the brain.
Food changes and vitamin, mineral changes could help. Things such as taking adaptogens or something like holy basil lowers cortisol, omega 3 lowers inflammation, and B complex turns food into fuel. Taking meds such as antidepressants, sleep aid, blood pressure meds can increase inflammation and impair hormone function. Ginseng has been studied and believed to be incredibly beneficial so if you haven't tried it look into it. American and Korean only if you want more info I am no expert but I've read a little about it and tell you what I've learned.
Hey guys,I know this discussion has been inactive for over a year now, but I was hoping I could get some feedback as to whether or not anyone figured out a solution to their symptoms?
You're welcome ElleJay, and indeed the B12 sprays are good to mention as an alternative for the sub.ling. pills. They are harder to find though and a bit more expensive. On the other hand they contain less additives which could make them an option for people with certain allergies for fillers, colorings etc.
I know it's been awhile since you posted. Hopefully, if you haven't sorted this out already, this will help you. Or, at least, this may help others in this forum.\nSounds like many of you have a B12 deficiency.
Hi ElleJay84, it's good you point this out to people, since a B12 deficiency is much more common than people think (and doctors say).\nI have to disagree with you though on supplementation; sublingual tablets are at least as efficient as shots, and the good quality ones contain a form of B12 (methylcobalamin) which is much better utilized by the body than the one in shots (hydroxycobalamin).\nBesides that; shots are rather unpleasant and need a visit to the doctors office.\nNote: it's important to slowly suck the B12 sublingual tablets away, don't chew or swallow them, the B12 gets absorbed by the mucosa lining in your mouth.\nI used these tablets (3000mcg) for 6 weeks and went from serum levels of 151 to 402.\nBtw, adding methylfolate increases the restorative effect of B12 supplementation.
Good to know! And I guess sucking on the supplements to ensure they are properly absorbed would make sense, since the B12 oral spray seems to work pretty well. Kinda the same concept...
You have anxiety disorder. Get help from a psychiatrist. Medication to keep you calmer and session to talk is what you need.
Just wanted to check with you guys here, when you say you can`t concentrate, that`s a continues situation for you or it happens only when you get stressed?
Glad to know that you're feeling better. Out of curiosity, what was the official diagnosis?
Hi Nightdash, your post would be more helpful if you would add some details on your treatment, for instance how the illness is labeled by your doctor and what kind of treatment you are receiving.
you're not gonna be healthy as times goes by. Your mentality will break down and your attitude can't be controlled anymore in the worst case also, your speech gets weirder as times goes by. This abnormal disease have no cure yet as they don't believe on Oriental doctor.. but sadly only a single digit of oriental doctor knows the truth. I have the same symtoms with you and I'm currently getting cure and steadly getting back. I'm also having a case where a single drawing will get me a fatigue and a physical work will follow a week of fatigue. as for being spacy gets better and my mentality goes stable.. I got this since I was 13 and having it for a long time made me sick and crazy. I'm getting better for about 10% ..
any other issues, sharp pains in the back of the skull mainly around the left side base of the skull? just cuirous. SPECT scan or fMRI may been more what you need, they are possibly looking for cysts in mris
Below are various resources for Menopause from leaflets to useful web sites and recommended discussions.
There are patient leaflets on Menopause as below which also have related tabs with more information such as medicine leaflets, blogs etc.
NICE Guidelines on Depression:
I think everyone will find this useful.
I am wondering why I'm not getting all the posts to the menopause/perimenopause forum as I used to. I do post to it myself. I thought that hardly anyone was posting anymore, but I can see from the discussions here that lots of people are. All the posts and replies normally appear in my own email. Can this be rectified please, as I do find the forum very supportive.
Can you show how to deactived my account? Thanks,
wil diabetes intensify these symptoms especially the itching?
I hope you don't mind me responding to your post. You asked about a blood test to determine if you are menopausal.
SIXTY-SIX PHYSICAL SYMPTOMS: Part one 1 - 49
These are very real physical changes and conditions. Some symptoms alarm a woman that she may be suffering from a serious disease. Perhaps you know the more common ones related to menopausal symptoms in this list. But many of these may surprise you, as they have not been typically associated with this normal physiological transformation.
1. Change in Menstrual Cycle, Cycles may get closer together or farther apart, lighter and shorter in duration or much heavier, lasting longer than one has been accustomed to. Menses may seem to take forever to begin with dark spotting for days until you actually flow, or you might feel like you have your menses every two weeks.
3. Headaches, Migraines, especially before, during or at the end of your menses debilitate and radically interferes with normal functioning.
4. Decreased Motor Coordination, Clumsiness, almost begins to make the woman who experiences this feel like she is a bit spastic, certainly less than graceful during perhaps an already awkward period in her life.
5. Lethargy, a persistent feeling sluggishness physically and mentally, that seems to negate ones ability to do much.
6. Physical Exhaustion , and Crushing Crashing Fatigue that can come on so suddenly and grip you into feeling like you will collapse unless you stop this instant.
7. Exacerbation of any Chronic Illness or Existing Condition transpires as hormones decline or deviate from their normal balance.
8. Insomnia, this includes a new or unusual pattern of either difficulty falling asleep, or dropping off to sleep for a few hours and then awakening with the inability to return to sleep.
9. Sleep Disturbances sometimes are from nightmares, night sweats, or just a vague sense of restlessness keeping you up or disrupting your precious revitalizing retreat from this realm of responsibilities.
11. Interference With Dream Recall interrupts the sense of normal sleep, if you are someone accustomed to vivid or at least some detailed memory of your dreamtime.
12. Muscle Cramps can occur anywhere in the body from legs to back to neck, and sometimes reflects the need for more calcium, or simply that your progesterone levels are too low.
13. Low Backache often worsens before or during menses, but if your hormones remain at low levels, you can experience it on a regular basis.
14. Gall Bladder Symptoms of pain, spasms and discomfort felt in the right upper abdominal quadrant under the ribs, which may be accompanied by belching, bloating, and intolerance to certain foods reflect the increased liver load with declining hormones.
15. Frequent Urination, or sensations that mimic urinary infections is a disturbing symptom often unrelieved by actual urination. It is often experienced as the sensation of needing to urinate all the time, even immediately afterwards.
16. Urinary Incontinence, the uncontrollable and spontaneous loss of urine, or the Urge for Incontinence, can occur suddenly or feel continuous, and not only in response to coughing, sneezing, jumping or running.
17. Hypoglycemic Reactions happen when suddenly your blood sugar crashes and you must have food now.
18. Food Cravings, often for sweets or salty foods, but can include sour or pungent foods.
19. Increased Appetite, especially at night and after dinner contributes to that unusual and unwanted weight gain.
20. Dark Circles Under Eyes can also be caused by adrenal exhaustion and thyroid dysfunctions, but no amount of sleep seems to eliminate it.
21. Joint and Muscle Pain, Achy, Sore Joints, Muscles and Tendons, which sometimes develop into actual carpal tunnel syndrome, or give rise to the questioning of other disease possibilities.
22. Increased Tension in Muscles demonstrates itself in those hunched up shoulders as you work or talk about anything uncomfortable, along with promoting lower back pain and a stiff neck.
23. Increased Hair Loss or Thinning anywhere on body, including your head, armpits, pubic area.
24. Increase in Facial Hair especially under your chin, or along your jaw line. It may be defined by generalized hair growth, or a specific and coarse single strand of hair that pokes out, even curls.
25. Unusually Hair Growth, around Nipples, between Breasts, down your back, places where your hair was finer, less coarse.
26. Acne, quite disturbing to any woman who dealt with this in adolescence and never thought it would recur.
27. Infertility causes grief in the person who postponed pregnancy in her earlier years and now wishes to conceive, carry to term a healthy baby, and discovers she is unable to do so.
28. Loss of Breast Tissue begins with the decrease of progesterone production. Women often feel as though their breast have become empty sacs devoid of their normal fullness, with or without sagging.
31. Cold Extremities feels quite strange especially in the presence of a hot flash, the combination of which is not impossible.
32. Being Accident Prone, bumping into things, not even realizing it until the bruise reveals itself later and then lacking the ability to recall the causative incident feels perplexing and a little scary at the prospect of something more damaging.
34. Loss of Sexual Energy, our Libido, can be marked by a gradual or sudden disinterest in sex, to the development of an actual aversion.
35. Painful Sex often described as if one?s vagina would tear open at the point of penetration along with feelings of abrasion during intercourse.
37. Dizziness, feeling lightheaded and the loss of physical balance, and even a bit wobbling at times, requires pause in movement to prevent falling over or deepening into vertigo or feeling faint.
38. Ringing in the Ears, Tinnitus, can be experienced as a pulsing sensation, a whooshing sound, an almost musical or buzzing sound with a fuzzy sensation.
39. Abdominal Bloating comes on suddenly often after eating, or seems to be all the time, and can be visibly evident making you feel that you look like you are pregnant.
41. Fluid Retention, Edema, commonly with swelling in the legs and ankles, though not limited to this area and it is unrelieved by urination.
42. Palpitations or Heart Racing usually comes on suddenly, without warning or provocation, and dissipates spontaneously. The experience can be so wild and intense that a woman may become alarmed and wonder if she is having a heart attack.
43. Irregularities in your Heart Rate may feel more like your heart has just done a flip-flop or skipped a beat.
44. Constipation/Diarrhea, intermittent or alternating, results from declining hormone levels, which increase the demands on liver function and alters intestinal motility.
45. Tendency towards Candidiasis can increase, even if you have no prior known history ? and if you do, it may worsen.
46. Gastrointestinal Distress, Increased Flatulence, Unrelieved Gas pains, Indigestion, Nausea all can reflect intestinal changes due to hormonal imbalances.
47. Slow Digestion often goes along with the bloat ? what previously took four to five hours to digest, now seems to take all night. It seems worse in the evenings.
48. Lack of Appetite may be experienced as more of a lack of interest in food, going to the frig and standing there with the door open and staring blankly. Feeling completely uninspired, you busy yourself with something else and forget that you need to eat.
49. Changes in Body Odor especially disturbing when it seems to focus in the groin area, but can be anywhere on the body.
50. Puffy Eyes, not only from sleep disturbances, but also can accompany low progesterone.
51. Facial Pallor alternating with Facial Flushes is often intermittent with hot flashes.
54. Dry Hair, Change in Skin Tone, Integrity, and Texture, becomes more wrinkled, and may begin the thinning process.
55. Changes in your Fingernails characterized by easy breakage, bending, cracking and getting softer.
56. Itchy, Crawly Skin with a strange sensation like insects crawling around under the skin ? quite different than the dry skin feeling.
57. Muscle tone seems to slack and sag, and loose its previous response to normal exercise.
59. Dry, Itchy Eyes felt in the deep posterior aspect of the eye socket, as well as superficially.
60. Teeth Aching or the experience of a strange sensation in one?s teeth or gums, often accompanied by an increase in bleeding gums.
61. Change in the normal Tongue sensation, which can be accompanied by a feeling of burning in your tongue and roof of mouth, malodorous breath or change in breath odor, and/or a bad taste in your mouth.
62. Memory Loss or Lapses in time, makes one feel disoriented and less focused, especially when you go into another room to get something specific and seconds later cannot remember what you went to retrieve.
63. Feeling Faint for no known reason (this does not include standing up too quickly)
64. Tingling in Extremities not only feels weird and like your hands or feet are falling asleep, but if persistent can be a symptom of diabetes, B12, potassium or calcium deficiency, or a compromise in blood vessel flexibility.
66. Increase and worsening of Allergies occurs as hormones become imbalanced, so can our immune system.
seems it only goes to 1 - 49 on this site I saw this on.....
thought it may be useful info for some ladies unfamilair with whats going on ..
How are you doing with perimenopause?
BRILLIANT! Thanks for this.
WE ASKED PATIENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THIS RESEARCH PROJECT: ‘YOUR EARS’
May 2017 we asked you to take part in the above research:
April 2018, only 155 have taken part in this study and the target is 500.
We need the 500 so we are well short of the target.
Preliminary findings show that there is a connection but we cannot take it forward without your input.
I know that only patients who live in the UK can take part…….so it is down to us and it costs you nothing except your time.
I am appealing to all of you to help yourself and people in the future who will develop GCA and PMR.
Researchers all over the world are looking for cause, cure and better diagnostic procedures.
Will you help or am I asking too much?
The Research & Development section of Queen Elizabeth Hospital Gateshead NHS Foundation Trust is to continue research following the result of the basic survey which we did last year on ‘Your Ears’
They need at the very least 500 people with GCA , GCA&PMR and PMR. It would be amazing if we could get more patients to participate.
YOU now need to contact the Queen Elizabeth Hospital Research and Development in one of the following ways:
Subject heading: Research: GCA&PMR.
Once your initial enquiry has been received research documentation will be sent to you and if via the postal service a prepaid envelope will be supplied for you to return the completed documentation.
Copied from Eileen's post in another discussion.
1 day new dose, 6 days old dose
Further comment from Eileen in original discussion:
New steroid taper web application stores copies of steroid taper plans which can be viewed online or downloaded.
http://www.pmrgca.co.uk/content/steroidapp
I am still in contact with Ragnar, do you still chat to him?
If anyone has any further suggestions for inclusion do not reply to this but please contact me separately.
PMR-GCA NE can be found at www.pmr-gca-northeast.org.uk
PMRGCA-NW SUPPORT GROUP http://www.pmrgcasupport.co.uk/
New Book on the Block – “Living with PMR&GCA”.
‘Living with PMR & GCA’ written and produced by patients for patients has been issued to all members of PMR&GCAuk North East Support, Charity Reg No 1138409 May 2015.
The book is available to non-members and the details can be found by clicking on this link http://www.pmr-gca-northeast.org.uk/index.php?id=9.
Members of the PMR & GCA NE support group describe how the support group has had a positive impact in their lives and the lives of their families.
PMRUSA - Yahoo support group for USA/Canadian users.
http://www.pmrandgca.org.uk/research-and-clinical-guidelines-0 This is a page with links to full articles on Research and Clinical Guidelines including A clinical review of Polymyalgia Rheumatica by BMJ and the BSR/BHPR Guidelines for the management of PMR and GCA.
In an attempt to make this reduction scheme available more simply to the people who request it I am posting it here where it can be found easily. I hope noone minds but I have copied and pasted it what feels like dozens of time!
I don't know what to tell you. There are several people on this and other site dedicated to PMR who had also problem with diagnosis because they had "normal" blood test. 20% of PMR patients never have increased inflammation markers. Synovitis is sometimes add-on to PMR, but not always. As far as "PMR will NEVER give muscle atrophy even when left untreated for a long time", that is complete nonsense. If you cannot use your muscle due to pain ( or any other reason, say you are immobilized in a bed), you will have muscle atrophy.
If I were you I would look for more experience, older rheumatologist, who has actually seen and treated PMR to diagnose you properly.
I am sorry to hear about your dilemma.
I despair when I hear the limited knowledge of some of the medical profession. It is the fact that they are so wrong in their knowledge which is really frightening. I imagine they must be treating people with other illnesses the same way. Aghhh.
Krillemy, I sorry that you have met several doctors with the GOD complex!🤔
Yes some of them do feel close to God - and neurologist are even closer to God as we say here 😃 LOL
Strange chap - PMR includes bursitis and synovitis. Is he sure he's thinking of the right disease?
No - forget that - PMR does include both but I'm not sure it is essential for diagnosis.
What did they find in the PET scan? Anything?
But bursitis and synovitis ARE part of PMR - that doesn't make sense.
Funny - been saying that for a while!!
That they have very fixed ideas about what PMR is and how it should present. It is a very heterogenous illness and there is no fixed pattern. It may be something else - but frankly, if a moderate dose of pred deals with the symptoms, that is as good as anywhere to start.
Can anyone advise me on what worked for them in reducing this problem?
You could buy Dust Mite- and Allergen-Proof Pillow Encasings. That would solve your pillow problem. You could put these over any pillow. Good luck!
I do not believe a feather pillow is better than a synthetic filling. Too many people are allergic to the feathers. And the synthetic stuff is from all different kinds of material.
And finally you really ought to consider getting an allergy test done. And if you live in the US I think it's very important for you to choose an ear nose and throat doctor to do your allergy test rather than an allergist. The allergy test done by the ear nose and throat doctor is so much more comprehensive than the one the allergist actually does. Seems contradictory but it's the case. I can explain why if you want me to.
Okay when an allergist does their type of allergy test they give you a minut amount of the allergen and see if you have a reaction. If you have no reaction they assume you're not allergic to it. But an ENT gives you the allergen and if you do not have a reaction they give you a little bit more to see if you react to a higher amount of the allergen. If you then react to the higher amount they consider it and allergy. They also put the allergen in by injection just under the skin. Where as an allergist does a scratch test. So there you have it. :-)
Be sure to mention your sinuses to the ENT it might be that you need sinus surgery. It's a very simple procedure you go home the same day
Well obviously that's your choice and we have to make choices for our own bodies. I hope you get some relief for these allergy shots.
I'm sorry liauq that message about my allergist and ENT was meant for deemac7949.
do you took citrizine?
Dust mites are extremely tiny bugs that belong to the spider family. They live in house dust and feed on the dead skin cells that people regularly shed. Dust mites can survive in all climates and at most altitudes. They thrive in warm environments, preferring those at 70°F (21°C) and 70 percent relative humidity.
When you breathe in the waste products of dust mites, your immune system kicks into high gear, producing antibodies against the normally harmless substances. This overzealous immune response causes the symptoms associated with a dust mite allergy, such as sneezing and runny nose.
Dust allergies also make it difficult to breathe and may trigger asthma symptoms, such as wheezing, coughing, tightness in the chest and shortness of breath. Dust also just makes some people itchy.
People with dust allergies often suffer the most inside their own homes or in other people’s homes. Oddly enough, their symptoms often worsen during or immediately after vacuuming, sweeping and dusting. The process of cleaning can stir up dust particles, making them easier to inhale.
Would you please share the details how to change the diet please.
Hello, liauq. I could recommend you getting rid of all your feather pillows, old carpets, blankets and matressess and get a new ones. You know, you may have allergy for feathers as well, so getting a synthetic bed linen would be a decent choice here.
Why not ask your GP for a colonoscopy? Then you could rule out cancer or probably catch it early enough to be treated successfully.
Do it, get the colonoscopy, for your peace of mind, if nothing else.
Did you ever find out what was wrong?
i find your post is the latest. i have the similar symptoms, if any one find the solution please respond back.
What was your symptoms.
Hi Daffs, thank you so much for replying. Firstly im very sorry to hear you have cancer. I do hope you get better soon.
Thanks for your wishes. Take care Daffs
Hi Daffs, im so glad u seem 2 be doing ok. all that waiting is a joke hopefully when ur at the new placeit wont be as bad.
grrrr hit enter to soon lol.
keeping you in my prayers
So sorry Loush. That's why we need our GPs. He/She can get it in 2 wks, no more than 4.
Friend has ibs but she goes the other way and does bleed but not constant. She eats rubbish food anyway. Never fruit and veg.
hope u get your chemo schedule sorted, by the sounds of it R.Marsden would be perfect 4 u.
wot symptoms did u have b4 ur diagnosis if u don't mind me asking.
Sorry, have to finish this later, machine playing up
Hi again Loush, Always have trouble logging onto th
Try again and I didn't hit enter. Not my machine no problem with other sites. You may try other sites, 2 main big ones, strictly cancer, but get people, like you, who have symtoms and don't know. Many people who will give you info.
Hi Loush, I'll try and fin. this time (ho0pe you're reading this!
Hope you are ok. You shoulod make tyourself eat, I do. Can't get well if you don't.
ty so 4 much 4 staying in touch, I appreciatet it very much. It cant be easy after all ur going through but im sure that its nice to talk to different people.
Im so glad u got ur treatment in Hammersmith. Its bad enough that u need the treatment in the 1st place but when u have 2 do a lot of travelling 2 and from hospital to get it, it fairly takes it out of u.
I think you should ask your gp about Lanzoprazole. There are other .....prazoles. He might give you that.
sorry u felt so bad this morning. It's good to rest when u can.
Have never heard of Guanabana juice.
the kids r great they tidy there toys up after them n keep the place tidy so that's half the battle.
Keep well Daffs, talk to ya soon Loush
Very glad to hear your kids are helpful, it makes a difference. Give them good wishes from me, just for that.
Thought anymore about trying these other websites for cancer, you won't be sorry.
Im so glad ur feeling a lot better and well rested, I can only imagine what ur going through and I really do hope you get through this.
thank you so much for the wishes for the kids, I gave them a hug this morning and said it was from Daffs n they looked at me like id lost the plot lolo.
Hope you feel better soon, stay away from acid foods and let that calm down. Maybe it is, umm what did I say. Ah yes, gastroenteritis as you don't bleed. Godbless Loush, Daffs
So sorry uve had probs with online shopping, hope u get sorted with ur mattress. A talk with victim support couldn't do any harm.
So, a colonoscopy should reveal all if you haven't already had one. Sorry to ramble on and best wishes.
Hello John,  I think the colonoscopy is the best way, not only for cancer but other tum problems.  What happened to Loush I don't know, haven't heard from her.  Her gp is typical, draging their feet.  Let the bloods wait.  If you post on Macmillan or Beating Bowel Cancer you will find that most people who are in an advanced stage of cancer because gps put it something else for too long before the colonscopy.
You went thru it rather quickly.  How was your gp after that?  No chemo or radiotherapy after the op?  You sound like you are doing fine now.
Sorry, I'm rabbling on.  You didn't John, nice to hear your storey and I hope it made an impression on Loush.
Best wishes for continued health.  Godbless,  Daffs
I'll close now, sun is shining and no rain, up to my lot, take care John
Look after yourself and keep on about your mattress etc.
I meant to say hole in my tum, not rum!
hope u r keeping well.  I am glad u have finished ur chemo and i pray for u that it has done what it needs to do.
thank u so much for finding the time to reply to me.
hope you both keep well and i will let you know if i hear anything more..
Great that you are getting to see someone at last! All the best...
Hi Loush,  So nice to hear from you at last.  Well, today's the Day.  Very glad you're off to the hosp. Horrible just hanging around waiting.  Please do let us know.  You're prob. going to see the Consul., are you.  I've got everything crossed.Hope your boy gets better soon.
Very best wishes.  You're on my mind.  Godbless,  Daffs
Thank you for your reply jhon, I really appreciate the reassurance. In the meantime it is a long wait as loush is experiencing. Have you heard of people bleeding sporadically and having these sort of syptoms and it not being cancer?
Are you all clear now?
Hoping you are well and thanks again for the reply
Yes, I would advise to have the colonoscopy.  It's the only way to get a thorough diagnosis of what's wrong in your tum.
If it's not cancer and I hope it isn't, then they will be able to tell you what it is.
Ps just seen that loush has replied so I really glad you have got an app now. These doctors are terrible at talking people seriously.
I hope this finds you and yours happy and healthy, especially your eyes since sadly I just found this site and all seems to be from two years ago.
I advise you not to drive for about a month to let you eyes adapt to this change in vision. You may need to advise the DVLA and your insurance if you are in UK.
Rose it could be where the laser burned the retina to seal it. It should gradually decrease but you may have a permanent small blind patch. Dont worry about this as your other eye will compensate when looking with both eyes.
Most people are concerned when they develop problems affecting their eyes, particularly if this affects their ability to see clearly. This leaflet describes most eye conditions which can affect vision, either temporarily or permanently. It explains what symptoms you might expect and what can be done about them.
Visual loss can be partial (meaning the vision is impaired or hazy) of complete (meaning all or part of the vision in one or both eyes is too poor for useful function). It may occur with or without pain, suddenly or gradually. All of these things are clues as to the cause. Some, but not all, visual loss is permanent and some, but not all, can be prevented.
The eye is a ball in a bony socket, moved by muscles. Medically the whole of the eye is referred to as the globe because of its spherical shape. This globe has a transparent 'front window' (the pupil), and a series of magnifying parts: the clear window of the eye (the cornea), the fluid inside the eye, and the lens all play a part in magnifying.
Then, at the back is a light-sensitive membrane called the retina, which sends information into the brain. This membrane is fed by a delicate network of blood vessels, called the choroid.
Problems arising in different parts of the eye can affect vision. Generally speaking, the further towards the back of the eye that problems occur, the more likely they are to have a long-lasting or permanent effect on your eyesight.
Nerve signals pass from the seeing cells in the retina down nerve fibres in the optic nerve to the area of the brain responsible for putting together and interpreting these signals, enabling us to see.
There are several problems which can affect the surface of the eye which can affect vision, although usually they mainly cause pain and redness. However, if severe they can cause permanent scarring of the clear window (cornea) which sits over the coloured part of the eye (the iris) and the pupil.
Active chemicals, such as strong acid, alkali or plaster dust, may damage the surface of the eye and cause scarring.
A huge arm of the health service is dedicated to prompting people to look after their health. From screening tests to vaccination schedules, you can't just rely on your doctor to fix you up when you're ill. Take control of your own destiny and discuss your care with our community.
Long-acting reversible contraceptives are very effective birth control methods. When you use these, you do not have to rely on remembering something every day. They last between 2 months and 10 years, depending on the option used. They may come in the form of injections, implants, and also devices which are placed in your womb (uterus).
The intrauterine contraceptive device (IUCD). This is also known as 'the coil'. It sits inside the womb (uterus) and, once fitted, can stay in your womb for up to ten years. The device is called a coil because in the 1960s some devices were coil-shaped. Read about the intrauterine contraceptive device.
You don't need to take a tablet every day, so for most LARCs, you can forget about contraception for years at a time. This makes them more reliable (as they don't need you to remember, other than when they are due to be replaced).
This is an individual choice. Different people will prefer different options. Pros and cons of each are weighed up in the separate leaflet called Contraception Methods, and there is plenty of information about each in their individual leaflets as linked above.
Think very carefully before you have this. The leaflets and the information that your doctor gives you is only half the story. I was told about irregular periods not continuous and persistant bleeding.